<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89609-0006 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.6-09-89.f2.A1005</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">FEDERAL RESERVE SYSTEM</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">12 CFR Part 226 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Reg. Z; Docket No. R-0655] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN: 7100-AA91 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Truth in Lending; Home Equity Disclosure and Substantive Rules </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Board is revising Regulation Z (Truth in Lending)to implement the Home Equity Loan Consumer Protection Act of 1988. Thelaw requires creditors to provide consumers with extensive informationfor open-end credit plans secured by the consumer's dwelling, and imposessubstantive limitations on these plans. Creditors will have to provideinformation at the time an application is provided to the consumer, includinginformation about the payment terms, fees imposed under the plan, and,for variable-rate plans, information about the index and a fifteen-yearhistory of changes in the index values. Creditors will be required to provideconsumers with a brochure prepared by the Board (or a suitable substitute)describing home equity plans. The regulation also imposes duties on thirdparties who provide applications to consumers and modifies the rules relatingto advertisements for home equity plans. In addition to these disclosure requirements, the regulation limits a creditor'sright to terminate a plan and accelerate any outstanding balance, or tochange the terms of a plan after it has been opened, and limits the typeof index that can be used for variable-rate plans.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>June 7, 1989, but compliance is optional untilNovember 7, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Sharon Bowman, Leonard Chaninor Thomas Noto, Staff Attorneys, or Michael Bylsma, Senior Attorney, Divisionof Consumer and Community Affairs, at (202) 452-3667 or 452-2412; for thehearing impaired only, contact Earnestine Hill or Dorothea Thompson, TelecommunicationsDevice for the Deaf, at (202) 452-3544, Board of Governors of the FederalReserve System, Washington, DC 20551.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">(1) Background </ITAG>In December 1987 the Board proposed amendments to Regulation Z to changethe existing disclosure requirements for home equity lines of credit securedby the consumer's principal dwelling (52 FR 48702). Subsequently, the HomeEquity Loan Consumer Protection Act was enacted on November 23, 1988 (Pub.L. 100-709). The law superseded the Board's proposal. The statute and amendments to the regulation leave in place existing disclosurerequirements for open-end plans. They add, however, two requirements tothis framework. First, as is the case for certain closed-end adjustable-ratemortgages (see andSection; 226.19(b) of Regulation Z), creditors generallywill be required to provide detailed disclosures about their home equityplans when an application is provided to the consumer. Second, creditorswill be required to provide additional information, along with the currentdisclosures, prior to the first transaction under the plan. In additionto these disclosures the statute and regulation place certain substantivelimitations on home equity plans. On January 23, 1989, the Board published a proposed rule to amend RegulationZ to implement the statute. (54 FR 3063). The Board received approximately150 comments on the proposal. A number of commenters expressed concernabout the new law, and in particular about the substantive requirements.They felt, however, that the Board had provided a workable framework toprovide guidance to creditors. Many commenters recognized that the statuteprovided the Board with little flexibility in implementing the act, butrequested further guidance on various issues. Based on a review of the comments and further analysis, the Board is adoptinga final rule implementing the act. The statute provides that creditorsmust comply with the law five months after enactment of final regulationsby the Board. Therefore, compliance is mandatory as of November 7, 1989.Creditors are free to comply with the new requirements prior to that date.<ITAG tagnum="84">(2) Amendments To Regulation Z </ITAG>The Home Equity Loan Consumer Protection Act is quite detailed and, forthe most part, the regulatory amendments mirror the statutory requirements.The amendments to Regulation Z incorporate the disclosure provisions intoa new andSection; 226.5b of the regulation and into existing andSection; 226.6.(A new andSection; 226.5a was added to Regulation Z by the Board on April6, 1989, to implement the Fair Credit and Charge Card Disclosure Act. See54 FR 13855. The changes now being made amend the regulation as it hasbeen modified by the amendments implemented under the Fair Credit and ChargeCard Disclosure Act.) Modifications are made to the form and timing rulesin andSection; 226.5, the change in terms rules in andSection; 226.9, the rescissionprovisions in section 226.15, and the advertising rules contained in andSection;226.16. Technical amendments also are made to andSection;andSection; 226.1,226.5a, and 226.14. This notice contains a detailed section-by-section discussion of the newrules and provides guidance on a large number of technical questions raisedby the commenters. In general, the amendments apply to open-end creditlines secured by the consumer's dwelling (not limited to the principaldwelling). The new rules require that creditors provide disclosures and a brochureat the time an application for such a line of credit is given to the consumer,although extra time is permitted in certain cases, such as where applicationsare made on the telephone or through intermediaries. The disclosures generallyhave to be grouped together and separated from any unrelated information.Among other things, creditors must describe the payment terms of the plan,including how the minimum payment is determined. The disclosures coverboth the draw period and any repayment period, although some informationabout the repayment period may be delayed until repayment begins. Creditorsmust itemize and provide the amount of any fees they impose to open oruse the plan, and an estimate of fees imposed by third parties to openthe plan. Detailed information about any variable-rate feature will be provided bycreditors. This includes the index used to determine the rate adjustments,the frequency of changes in the annual percentage rate (APR), and a fifteen-yearhistorical table showing how the APRs and payments would have been affectedby index value changes over that time. In addition to these early disclosures, the regulation requires that certaininformation (such as payment information) be given a second time alongwith the disclosures currently required when open-end credit accounts areopened. The regulation specifies which disclosures must be given a secondtime. Though the regulation principally deals with creditors, third parties havea limited duty to provide information if they provide applications to consumers.The advertising rules also are modified. For example, if an advertisementstates any payment information it must include other cost information.In addition to disclosures, the regulation contains substantive limitationson the way home equity plans may be structured. The regulation limits theability of a creditor to terminate a plan and accelerate any outstandingbalance, or to change the terms of a plan after it has been opened. Theregulation also limits the type of index a creditor can use for variable-rateplans.Renewals and ``conversions'' of home equity lines raise a number of issues.Guidance on how these should be handled appears later in this notice, aswell as how the effective date of the new rules will affect applicationsand new plans being offered on that date. Much of the information in thisnotice will be incorporated into the annual update to the Official StaffCommentary on Regulation Z that will be proposed for comment in the fall.Furthermore, a number of cross-references and modifications will be addedto existing commentary provisions when the Official Staff Commentary isproposed. For example, comment 6(a)(2)-2 (dealing with the ability of acreditor to increase a rate without reference to an index) and comment17(b)-2 (dealing with conversion of open-end credit to closed-end credit)will be modified to reflect the new home equity rules. Section 226.1_Authority, Purpose, Coverage, Organization, Enforcement andLiability The amendments to andSection;226.1 are largely unchanged from the proposal,except that they add a reference to the credit and charge card rules adoptedby the Board in April 1989. The amendments to andSection; 226.1(b) referencethe fact that variable-rate contracts secured by the consumer's dwellingmust state a maximum interest rate. (This requirement was added to  andSection;226.30 of the regulation in November 1987.) This section also referencesthe limitations imposed on home equity plans. The addition of andSection;226.1(c) reflects the fact that certain requirements of the home equityrules apply to persons other than creditors who provide applications toconsumers. The amendments to andSection; 226.1(d) add a reference to thenew home equity rules, and amendments made to implement the Fair Creditand Charge Card Disclosure Act (added to the regulation in April 1989).Section 226.5_General Disclosure Requirements Footnote 8 accompanying andSection; 226.5(a) is amended to reflect the factthat the disclosures required at the time of application need not be ina form that the consumer can keep. The existing rule in andSection; 226.5(a)(2)also applies to the early disclosure statement. Thus, when the term ``annualpercentage rate'' is disclosed with a number, it must be more conspicuousthan other required disclosures. A new paragraph (4) is added to andSection;226.5(a) to reflect the fact that andSection; 226.5b disclosures have theirown form rules. A new paragraph (4) is added to andSection; 226.5(b) to reflectthe fact that andSection; 226.5b disclosures have their own timing rules.Section 226.5a_Credit and Charge Card Applications and Solicitations Section 226.5a(a)(3) is modified to substitute the new regulatory citationof the home equity rules for the statutory citation in andSection; 226.5a.(Section 226.5a_dealing with credit and charge card applications and solicitations_doesnot apply to home equity plans accessible by a credit or charge card.)Section 226.5b_Requirements for Home Equity Plans Section 226.5b provides that the amendments to Regulation Z apply to allopen-end credit plans secured by the consumer's dwelling. Several commentersasked whether the home equity rules apply only where the consumer's principaldwelling is involved. While the statute uses the term ``principal dwelling,''it is specifically defined to include any vacation or second home of theconsumer. The Board is using the term ``dwelling'' since it has an establishedmeaning under Regulation Z. The final rules apply to all dwellings, a termdefined in andSection; 226.2(a)(19) of the regulation to include residentialstructures containing one to four units. Thus, the new rules are not limitedto plans secured by the consumer's primary dwelling. The regulation doesnot set out special owner-occupancy rules. However, the existing commentaryto andSection; 226.3(a) (which discusses whether transactions are consumeror business purpose credit in part based on owner-occupancy criteria) providesguidance on whether a home equity plan is subject to Regulation Z at all.The fact that coverage of these rules is broader than just principal dwellingdoes not affect the scope of any other provisions of the regulation. Thus,for example, the right of rescission applies only in cases where the consumer'sprincipal dwelling secures the credit.The APR referred to throughout new andSection; 226.5b is the APR correspondingto the periodic rate, as determined by andSection; 226.14(b). Since a numberof commenters were concerned that the statement to that effect in footnote10c in the proposal was ambiguous, the provision now appears in the introductionto the section. <ITAG tagnum="81">Conversion Rules </ITAG>A number of commenters requested guidance on what disclosures are requiredif the initial agreement calls for the draw phase of a plan to ``convert''to a repayment phase, which has many aspects of closed-end credit. Somehome equity plans provide in the initial agreement for a period duringwhich repayment of the amount borrowed is made, but no further draws maybe taken. In such cases, the disclosures must include information aboutboth phases of the plan. All of the disclosures in andSection; 226.5b, asapplicable, must be given for the repayment phase. Thus, for example, creditorsmust provide payment information about the repayment phase as well as aboutthe draw period, as required by andSection; 226.5b(d)(5). The informationset out in andSection; 226.5b(d)(7), andSection; 226.5b(d)(9) and, if the rateduring repayment will be variable, in andSection; 226.5b(d)(12) also mustbe given for the repayment phase. If the rate that will apply during therepayment phase is fixed at a known amount, the creditor must provide anAPR under andSection; 226.5b(d)(6) with regard to that phase. If, however,a creditor uses an index to determine the rate that will apply at the timeof conversion_even if the rate during the repayment phase will be fixed_creditorsmust provide the information in andSection; 226.5b(d)(12), as applicable.Although full disclosure of the terms about the repayment phase is required,creditors have a choice with regard to when it must be given. Creditorsmay provide all of this information at the time the other early disclosuresare given to the consumer, in accordance with andSection; 226.5b. As an alternative,creditors need disclose only the basic payment terms information underandSection; 226.5b(d)(5)(i) and (ii) with the early disclosures, and deferall the other required disclosures about the repayment phase until conversion.If provided at conversion, disclosures must be based on information availableat that later time. For example, the historical table as discussed underandSection; 226.5b(d)(12)(xi) must reflect the index for the most recentfifteen years. Sample form G-14C has been added to the appendix to theregulation to illustrate how this later disclosure might look. Creditorsusing either of these alternative disclosure rules are required to provideinformation about the repayment phase as set forth in andSection; 226.6 (Seethe discussion of this requirement under that section.) Creditors providing these disclosures, whether early or at conversion,are not required to provide any additional disclosures under the rulesin Subpart C of the regulation for closed-end credit. The existing rules(such as those in comments 17(b)-2 and 19(b)-2 of the Official Staff Commentary,which discuss converting an open-end account to a closed-end one) do notapply to home equity plans in which a repayment phase is provided for inthe original agreement. The Congress, in the act, requires disclosuresabout the closed-end aspects of a home equity line to be given as partof the home equity ``plan.'' The Board believes the Congress intended toprovide special treatment for this product. Consistent with this approachof treating both phases as a single open-end credit plan, during the repaymentphase creditors are required to continue providing periodic statementsunder andSection; 226.7 and to comply with other open-end credit rules setforth in Subpart B of the regulation, as well as the substantive rulesset forth in andSection; 226.5b(f). For example, if the original agreementprovides for a repayment phase with a variable-rate feature, rate changesmust be tied to an index not within the control of the creditor, as discussedin andSection; 226.5b(f)(1). If the original home equity line agreement does not call for a repaymentphase to follow the draw period, and the creditor and consumer later enterinto a closed-end credit agreement to repay the outstanding balance, thecreditor must give closed-end credit disclosures (including those underandSection; 226.19(b) and 226.20(c), if applicable) since this would be deemeda new transaction. In such cases, the substantive rules in andSection; 226.5b(f)do not apply to the closed-end credit transaction.Section 226.5b(a)_Form of Disclosures Unlike existing Truth in Lending requirements for closed-end and open-endcredit, the disclosures provided at the time of application need not bein a form the consumer can keep. Thus, although the disclosures must bein writing, creditors are permitted to place the first set of disclosureson the application form the consumer returns to the creditor to apply forthe plan. Although several commenters questioned this rule, the act andlegislative history make it clear that creditors are not required to providethis information in a form the consumer can keep. (The disclosures providedunder andSection; 226.6(e) of the regulation, however, must be in a formthe consumer can keep. See also the discussion under andSection; 226.6(e)for special rules when the early disclosures are given in a retainableform.) Section 226.5b(a) requires most of the disclosures to be grouped togetherand ``segregated'' from unrelated information provided to the consumerin connection with the application. The brochure and the variable rateinformation described in andSection; 226.5b(d)(12) may be provided eitherseparately from or with the other disclosures. Creditors choosing to providea description of the items referred to in andSection; 226.5b(d)(4)(iii)_forexample, the conditions under which the creditor may prohibit additionalextensions of credit_may give this information separately from or withthe other disclosures. Similarly, creditors choosing to provide a goodfaith itemization of fees imposed by third parties_as set forth under andSection;226.5b(d)(8)_also may give those disclosures separately from or with theother disclosures. (The disclosures required under these sections are setforth in greater detail under the specific sections.) Under the regulation, greater flexibility is permitted in complying withthe segregation standard than currently exists for closed-end credit. Disclosuresfor home equity plans tend to be less concise and more narrative in formthan those for closed-end credit. Therefore, the regulation applies a moreliberal standard that permits inclusion of information that explains orexpands on the required disclosures. Information on other aspects of theplan that is not related to the required disclosures, such as underwritingcriteria, however, is not permitted to be interspersed with the disclosures.Such information, of course, could be provided as long as it is separatefrom the required disclosures. The segregation requirement does not applyto the second set of disclosures, which are provided under andSection; 226.6prior to the first transaction. In the first set of disclosures, that is, those given at application, andSection;226.5b(a)(2) of the regulation provides that certain items will be furtherhighlighted by requiring them to precede the other disclosures. Consumerswill be notified, for example, that: (1) They should keep a copy of thedisclosures; (2) they have a right to obtain a refund of fees if termschange and they decide not to enter into the contract as a result; (3)they risk the loss of the dwelling in the event of default; and (4) a creditormay terminate a plan or suspend future advances under certain circumstances.With regard to the last item, if a creditor describes these conditions,the precedence rule does not apply to that descriptive disclosure. Theprecedence rule does not apply to the second set of disclosures at all.If creditors give a single disclosure form covering all of their home equityofferings, all aspects of their plans must be described in the first setof disclosures. For example, if a creditor offers several payment options,all options have to be set forth. Furthermore, if any aspects of a planare linked together_for example, if the consumer can obtain certain paymentoptions only in conjunction with other plan features, such as a particularvariable-rate feature_the creditor must clearly disclose the relation amongthose plan features. Creditors need not, however, reflect all payment optionsin providing the minimum payment example under andSection; 226.5b(d)(5)(iii),the ``worst case'' example under andSection; 226.5b(d)(12)(x), and the historicaltable under andSection; 226.5b(d)(12)(xi). (See the comments accompanyingthese sections for the specific disclosure requirements.) As an alternative to the combined disclosure method, creditors may prepareseparate disclosure forms where multiple options exist. For example, creditorsoffering more than one payment option during the draw phase or during anyrepayment phase of a plan may choose to create separate disclosure formsfor such variations. Thus, creditors who offer consumers a choice duringthe draw period, for example, of (1) minimum payments equal to any accruedunpaid finance charge or (2) minimum payments equal to two percent of theoutstanding balance, could choose to create separate disclosure forms forthe two payment options. Creditors who follow this alternative of preparingseparate disclosures must include a statement on each form that the consumershould ask about the creditor's other home equity programs. (This disclosurewould be required only with respect to other programs available to thepublic and not, for example, employee preferred-rate plans.) Creditorswould have to provide disclosures about their other programs as soon asreasonably possible in response to any request for the disclosures. Section 226.5b(b)_Time of Disclosures Section 226.5b(b) requires the disclosures and brochure to be given atthe time an application is provided to the consumer. In the case of applicationscontained in publications such as magazines or received by the creditorthrough third parties, footnote 10a allows the creditor to mail or deliverthe disclosures and brochure to the consumer within three business daysof its receipt of the application. Several commenters suggested this three-dayperiod begin upon receipt of a ``completed application'', recommendingthat the Board use the term as used in Regulation B (which implements theEqual Credit Opportunity Act). This has not been adopted in the final regulation.Regulation B uses the term ``completed application'' to begin the timeperiod in which creditors must notify an applicant of action taken on anapplication. This is appropriate since a creditor may not be able to makea credit decision until all relevant information has been received. Thepurpose of the home equity early disclosure rules is quite different. Theyare meant to assist consumers in shopping for credit; thus it is importantto provide information early in the shopping process. The three-day delay applies where the creditor takes an application overthe telephone. If, however, the consumer simply requests over the telephonethat an application be mailed, the creditor must provide the disclosuresand a brochure with the application sent to the consumer. (Creditors shouldconsult the rules in andSection; 226.5b(h) regarding the imposition of anonrefundable fee before receipt of the disclosures.) Some creditors use a general purpose application for their home equityplans as well as their other credit products. The home equity disclosuresand brochure must accompany this type of application if the applicationor materials accompanying it indicate that it can be used to apply fora home equity line of credit. In addition, if a general purpose applicationis provided to a consumer as a result of an injury about a creditor's homeequity plan, the disclosures and brochure must accompany the application,even if the application or accompanying materials do not specify that itcan be used to apply for a home equity plan.Commenters also asked how the disclosure rules relate to mail solicitationsand so-called ``take-ones.'' In cases where the creditor sends applicationsthrough the mail, the creditor must send the disclosures and a brochurealong with the application. Applications made available to the public withoutneed for a request, such as ``take-ones,'' also have to be accompaniedby (or combined with) the disclosures and a brochure. Several commenters raised the issue of whether disclosures had to be providedwith ``response cards.'' Some creditors provide a response card insteadof an application in solicitation materials sent to consumers. Consumersare requested to return the card to the creditor to indicate their interestin the home equity product. Creditors need not provide the home equitydisclosures and brochure with the response card if the only action takenby the creditor upon receiving the card is to send an application formto the consumer (which would then be accompanied by the disclosures anda brochure), or to telephone the consumer regarding an application. In any situation in which footnote 10a applies, thus permitting a delayin disclosures, the creditor may determine within the three-day periodthat the application will not be approved. In such a case, the creditorneed not provide the disclosures or the brochure. The same would be trueif the consumer withdraws the application within that time period. If an application contained in a magazine or other publication is mailedto an intermediary or broker or if such a person takes an application overthe telephone, footnote 10a permits that person to mail the disclosuresand a brochure within three business days of receipt. (See the discussionbelow of when such third parties have a duty to provide disclosures.) Section 226.5b(c)_Duties of third parties In addition to requiring creditors to provide disclosures and a brochureto consumers at an earlier time, andSection; 226.5b(c) of the regulationimposes a limited duty on third parties who provide applications to consumers.Under andSection; 226.5b(c), a third party is required to provide disclosuresonly if that party has the disclosures for a creditor's particular homeequity plan in its possession. Third parties do not have an affirmativeduty to obtain such disclosures about a creditor's program, or to createa set of disclosures based on what the third party knows about a creditor'sprogram. The Board believes that requiring both a third party and a creditorto provide the consumer with identical information about the same planwould result in unnecessary duplication. If, however, a creditor suppliesdisclosures to a third party along with its application form, the thirdparty must give the consumer the disclosures when the application formis given out. In all cases, consumers will be provided disclosures by thecreditor within three days after the creditor receives the application.Furthermore, a nonrefundable fee cannot be collected from the consumerby the creditor or a third party until after the consumer receives thedisclosures. (See andSection; 226.5b(h).) Although the duty of third parties to provide the disclosures may ariseinfrequently, the regulation requires third parties, in all cases, to givethe home equity brochure at the time an application is given to the consumer.Because providing the brochure is not linked to the availability of informationfrom a creditor about its specific plan, the Board believes third partieswill have access to the brochure, and thus be able to provide it with theapplication. This provision imposes duties on third parties and not on creditors. Thereforecreditors are not responsible for ensuring that the third parties complywith the requirements of this section. Section 226.5b(d)_Content of disclosures Section 226.5b(d) of the regulation lists the information to be given toconsumers when they receive an application for home equity plans. As isthe case with existing Truth in Lending disclosure rules, the informationwould be provided only to the extent applicable; thus, for example, ifnegative amortization cannot occur in a program, no mention of it needbe made. Section 226.5b(d)(1)_Retention of information Because the disclosures need not be in a form the consumer can keep, theconsumer will be advised to make and retain a copy of the disclosures.Creditors need not include this statement if the disclosures are in a formthe consumer can keep, for example, if the disclosures are not part ofthe form that must be returned to the creditor to apply for a plan. Section 226.5b(d)(2)_Conditions for disclosed terms Creditors will include a statement of any time by which an applicationmust be submitted to obtain specific terms disclosed. A number of commentersmisunderstood this provision in the proposal. Creditors are free to notguarantee any terms, in which case they must indicate that all of the termsare subject to change. In that case, they need not include a date or timeperiod. The legislative history makes clear that a creditor also may chooseto guarantee some of the terms of the plan and not others. If creditorschoose to guarantee only some of the terms, they must indicate which termsmay change prior to opening the plan. Creditors can provide a specificdate or use a time period as long as the consumer can determine from thedisclosure the specific date by which an application must be submittedto obtain any guaranteed terms. Creditors also must notify the consumer of the right to a refund of allfees paid in connection with the application if any disclosed term changesbefore opening the plan and as a result the consumer chooses not to enterinto the plan. The final regulation has been amended to clarify that thisprovision does not apply to changes resulting from fluctuations in theindex value in a variable-rate plan; this includes changes in the APR andchanges in the maximum rate or ``cap'' if it is expressed as an amountover the initial interest rate. (See the discussion of this provision atandSection; 226.5b(g).) Section 226.5b(d)(3)_Security interest and risk to home Creditors will have to disclose the fact that a security interest is beingtaken in the consumer's dwelling and that the consumer may lose the homein the event of default. Section 226.5b(d)(4)_Possible actions by creditor Under andSection; 226.5b(d)(4), a statement must be provided that, undercertain circumstances, a creditor may terminate the plan and accelerateany outstanding balance, prohibit additional advances or reduce the creditlimit, and, if applicable, implement certain modifications to the originalterms, as set forth in the initial agreement. The regulation, in conformitywith the legislative history accompanying the act, also requires a statementthat fees may be imposed if the account is terminated by the lender. Thisdisclosure regarding fees is required, for example, if a penalty or prepaymentfee may be imposed upon termination by the lender in such circumstances.The disclosure would not be required if the fees are the same ones thatwould be imposed when the plan expires in accordance with the agreement.The actual amount of such fees need not be provided. In response to commenters,the Board is clarifying that this disclosure is not required if the onlyfees that may be imposed upon termination are fees such as attorney feesor court costs involved with the collection of the debt. Additionally,an increase in the APR_such as a higher rate of interest if the consumerfails to make payments_does not trigger this disclosure. Section 226.5b(d)(4)(ii) provides that consumers will be notified thatthey can receive, upon request, a description of the conditions that permitthe creditor to terminate the plan, prohibit additional advances or reducethe credit limit, and implement modifications during the term of the plan.Upon receiving a request from a consumer for such information prior tothe consumer opening the plan, the creditor must provide this informationas soon as reasonably possible. This requirement had previously been incorporatedin andSection; 226.5b(g) of the proposal.As an alternative to disclosing that the consumer has the right to receivea statement of the conditions under which the creditor may take the indicatedactions, andSection; 226.5b(d)(4)(iii) provides that the creditor may simplydisclose what those conditions are. One way to make this disclosure isto provide a highlighted copy of the contract, security agreement or otherdocument which contains such information. The relevant items must be distinguishedin some fashion from the other information contained in the document, forexample, by use of a cover sheet that specifically points out which contractprovisions contain this information, or by marking the relevant items.If a creditor does not choose to provide a document of this sort, it maysimply describe the conditions using the language in andSection;andSection;226.5b(f)(2) and 226.5b(f)(3)(vi). If specified changes may be implementedduring the plan as described in andSection; 226.5b(f)(3)(i), a statementsuch as the following could be made: ``The initial agreement permits usto make certain changes to the terms of the line at specified times orupon the occurrence of specified events.'' Whichever method is used toprovide the list of conditions, it may appear with the segregated disclosuresor apart from those disclosures. If it is with the segregated disclosures,it need not appear before other disclosures. Section 226.5b(d)(5)_Payment terms Under andSection; 226.5b(d)(5), creditors are required to describe the paymentterms of the plan, including the length of the draw period and any repaymentperiod. (The combined length of the draw period and any repayment perioddoes not have to be stated.) If the length is indefinite, creditors wouldstate that fact. Several commenters requested guidance on how renewal provisions shouldbe handled in making these disclosures. If, under the credit agreement,a creditor retains the right to review a line at the end of the specifieddraw period and determine whether to ``renew'' or extend the original drawperiod of the plan, such provisions should be ignored for purposes of thedisclosures. Thus if an agreement provides that the draw period is forfive years and that the creditor may renew the draw period for an additionalfive years, the possibility of renewal should be ignored and the draw periodshould be considered five years. A creditor may discuss a renewal featurewith the other disclosures without violating the segregation rules. Where a creditor provides a combined disclosure form for all of its homeequity offerings, all payment options must be stated, including any differentpayment terms that may exist during the draw period and during any repaymentperiod, as well as any differences that may apply within either period.As mentioned in the discussion of conversion rules under andSection; 226.5b,creditors may give some of the disclosures about the repayment phase atthe time of conversion, rather than with the early disclosures. Whetherthose disclosures are delayed or not, creditors must provide the basicpayment terms information under andSection; 226.5b(d)(5)(i) and (ii) withthe early disclosures about both the draw and repayment phases. If the plan permits the consumer to convert any of the loan balance toa fixed repayment term, this feature must be disclosed under andSection;226.5b(d)(5)(ii). Such a provision would be ignored for purposes of otherdisclosures, however, including the historical table under andSection; 226.5b(d)(12)(xi).The disclosures must set forth how the minimum periodic payment is determined,the frequency of payments, and whether making only the minimum paymentsmay not repay any or all of the principal balance by the end of the plan.The regulation also calls for a disclosure of the possibility of any balloonpayment. Under some programs, a balloon payment may occur under certaincircumstances, but is not certain or even likely. In such cases the disclosurewould indicate that a balloon payment <T3>may </T3>occur. In other cases, such as programs where payments includeinterest only, a balloon payment will occur as a matter of course and thedisclosures should reflect that fact. If repayment of the entire outstandingbalance would be required only in the case of termination and acceleration,the balloon disclosure would not apply. Section 226.5b(d)(5)(ii) does notrequire the amount of any balloon to be provided. (See the requirementunder andSection; 226.5b(d)(5)(iii), however.) The term ``balloon payment''need not be used. Several commenters asked whether a final payment thatis only slightly larger than any other payment (for example, because ofrounding) must be considered a balloon payment. Creditors need not disclosethere is a balloon payment if the final payment is not more than twicethe amount of other minimum payments under the plan. An explanation ofthe balance computation method is not required by this section. Section 226.5b(d)(5)(iii) requires creditors to disclose an example, basedon an assumed $10,000 outstanding balance and a recent APR, showing theamount of the minimum periodic payment and of any balloon payment, andthe time it would take to pay off the balance if the consumer made onlythose payments. If it is relevant to calculating its payments, a creditormay assume the credit limit as well as the outstanding balance is $10,000.The issue was raised of whether a creditor that only offers lines of creditfor less than $10,000 would have to use this amount in the example. Ifa creditor only offers lines of credit under $10,000, the creditor mayuse an alternative assumed outstanding balance of $5,000 rather than $10,000.Footnote 10c provides that, for fixed-rate plans, a recent APR is one thathas been in effect under the plan within the twelve months prior to thedate the disclosures are provided to the consumer. The footnote also providesthat, for variable-rate plans, a recent APR is the most recent index valueand margin provided in the historical table (see andSection; 226.5b(d)(12)(xi)),or a more recent rate. As an alternative to providing examples for each payment option_in plansthat have multiple payment options within the draw period or within anyrepayment period_creditors may provide representative examples. For purposesof this disclosure, as well as for the variable rate disclosures underandSection; 226.5b(d)(12)(x) and (xi) the Board is establishing three categoriesof payment options. The first category consists of plans that permit minimumpayment of only accrued finance charges (``interest only'' plans). Thesecond category includes plans in which a fixed percentage or a fixed fractionof the outstanding balance or credit limit (for example, 2% of the balanceor 1/180th of the balance) is used to determine the minimum payment. Thethird category includes all other types of minimum payment options, suchas a specified dollar amount plus any accrued finance charges. Creditorsmay classify their minimum payment arrangements within one of these threecategories, even if other features exist, such as varying lengths of adraw or repayment period, required payment of any past due amounts, minimumdollar amounts, and the payment of late charges. The creditor may use a single example within each category to representthe payment options in that category. For instance, if a creditor permitsminimum payments of 1%, 2%, 3% or 4% of the outstanding balance, it maypick one of these four options and provide the andSection; 226.5b(d)(5)(iii)example for that option alone. The example used to represent a categorymust be an option commonly chosen by consumers, or a typical or representativeexample. Creditors choosing to use a representative example within eachcategory must use the same examples for purposes of the disclosures underandSection; 226.5b(d)(5)(iii), 226.5b(d)(12)(x), and 226.5b(d)(12)(xi). Separateexamples must be given for the draw and repayment periods unless the paymentsare determined the same way during both periods.This approach of allowing a single example to represent a category of paymentoptions does not apply to the requirements under any other provisions.Creditors must fully describe all payment options under andSection; 226.5b(d)(5)(i) and (ii). Similarly, the payment information provided in accordancewith andSection; 226.6(e)(2) must reflect the actual payment option chosenby the consumer (or all of the options available if the consumer retainsseveral options during the plan). Certain ``reverse mortgages'' (sometimes called ``reverse annuity mortgages''or ``RAMs'') involve an open-end line of credit and require repayment infull only when certain events occur, such as the consumer's death. TheseRAMs are subject to the new rules if the line is secured by the consumer'sdwelling. The payment disclosures will reflect that a single payment isdue when one of the specified events happens. The single payment may beconsidered the ``minimum periodic payment'' and consequently would notbe treated as a balloon payment. The example of the minimum payment underandSection; 226.5b(d)(5)(iii) should assume a single, $10,000 advance tothe consumer when the plan is opened and should assume repayment will occurupon the consumer's death, if that is one of the events requiring repayment.In such cases, the disclosures may be based on a representative life expectancy,that is, one that is an average of, or is typical of, life expectanciesrecently used in developing the creditor's RAM. In making the disclosures,the creditor must assume that the $10,000 advance and any accrued interestwill be paid in full by the consumer and must disregard any non-recourseprovision (which provides that the consumer is not obligated for an amountgreater than the value of the dwelling). Some RAMs provide that some orall of the appreciation in the value of the property will be shared betweenthe consumer and the creditor. As part of the disclosure of the paymentterms, the creditor also must describe the shared appreciation feature.(See the discussion of this feature under andSection; 226.5b(f)(3)(i).) (Seealso the discussion of RAMs under andSection; 226.5b(d)(12) (x) and (xi).)Section 226.5b(d)(6)_Annual percentage rate Section 226.5b(d)(6) provides that, for fixed-rate plans, a recent APRwill be provided. Consumers also must be told that the APR does not includecosts other than interest. Some commenters argued that the proposal's referenceto ``the APR'' was too broad since the ``historical APR'' on periodic statementsdoes in fact include finance charges other than interest. The introductionto andSection; 226.5b makes clear that APR as used throughout andSection; 226.5brefers to the APR that corresponds to the periodic rate, as determinedunder andSection; 226.14(b). Section 226.5b(d)(7)_Fees imposed by the creditor Under andSection; 226.5b(d)(7), creditors will provide a description andthe amount of charges they impose to open, use and maintain the account,and a statement of when the consumer must pay the charges. These fees includeitems such as application fees, points, annual fees, transaction fees,and fees imposed when the plan converts to a repayment phase (if the conversionis provided for in the original agreement). Fees imposed by third parties,that are initially paid by the consumer to the creditor, may be includedin this disclosure or in the disclosures under andSection; 226.5b(d)(8).As discussed in andSection; 226.5b(f)(3)(i), a creditor may provide a stepfee schedule in which a fee will increase a specified amount at a specifieddate. The amount of any fees and when the fee is payable must be disclosedunder this section. Charges may be stated as an estimated dollar amountfor each fee, or as a percentage of a typical or representative amountof credit or house value. Several commenters asked whether fees imposedfor late payment, stop payment, exceeding the credit limit, or closingout an account would have to be disclosed under this section; they do not.Creditors need not use the term ``finance charge'' or ``other charge''in describing the fees imposed by the creditor under this section or thosefees imposed by third parties under andSection; 226.5b(d)(8). Some creditors provide that they will rebate closing costs, for example,to the extent any interest is paid during the first year of the plan. Regardlessof such a provision, if closing costs are imposed_even if possibly ``rebated''later_creditors must disclose such costs. (The existence of the rebatefeature may be included in the disclosures.) Section 226.5b(d)(8)_Fees imposed by third parties to open a plan Under andSection; 226.5b(d)(8), an estimate of the total fees imposed bythird parties to open the account (such as appraisal, credit report, governmentagency and attorney fees) stated as a single dollar amount or a range willbe provided. Fees imposed by third parties, even if initially paid to thecreditor, may be included in this disclosure. Even if such fees may be``rebated'' (as discussed in andSection; 226.5b(d)(7)), they must be disclosed.In response to comments, the Board has modified the regulation to clarifythat this section covers only those fees imposed by third parties to openthe plan. Thus, for example, this section does not require disclosure ofa fee imposed by a third party, such as a government agency, at the endof a plan to release a security interest. Creditors also must provide a statement that the consumer may request morespecific cost information about such fees from the creditor. Upon receivinga consumer's request for such an itemization prior to the consumer openingthe plan, the creditor must respond as soon as reasonably possible. Asan alternative to including this statement, creditors may provide an itemizationof such fees (by type and amount) with the early disclosures. Where impracticalto provide the dollar amount, fees may be expressed on a unit cost basis,for example, $.50 per $100 of the credit line. If provided, this itemizationmay appear together with or separate from the other disclosures. Section 226.5b(d)(9)_Negative amortization Under andSection; 226.5b(d)(9), a statement if the plan has negative amortization_whichwill increase the principal balance and reduce the consumer's equity inthe dwelling_must be provided. Section 226.5b(d)(10)_Transaction requirements Section 226.5b(d)(10) requires creditors to state any limitations on thenumber of extensions or amount of credit that can be obtained during anytime period, and any minimum draw or minimum outstanding balance requirementstated as a dollar amount or as a percentage. A limitation on ATM usageis not covered by this provision, unless that is the only means by whichthe consumer can obtain funds. This provision does not require a disclosureof the maximum credit limit offered by the creditor. Section 226.5b(d)(11)_Tax implications Section 226.5(d)(11) requires that consumers be told to consult a tax advisorif further information regarding the deductibility of interest and chargesunder the plan is desired. Section 226.5b(d)(12)_Disclosures for variable-rate plans Section 226.5b(d)(12) requires creditors to provide information about anyvariable-rate feature contained in a plan. Many of these disclosures closelyparallel the disclosures currently required for closed-end variable-ratetransactions secured by a consumer's principal dwelling. (See andSection;226.19(b) of the regulation.) As discussed above in the general commentson andSection; 226.5b, under this section information must be provided asto variable-rate features of both the draw period and any period in whichrepayment occurs with no further ability to obtain advances. There is,however, some flexibility regarding the timing of the disclosures aboutthe repayment period. These disclosures, like others, need be providedonly as applicable. (See andSection; 226.5b(f)(3)(i) for features that arenot considered variable rate and thus do not require disclosure under thissection.) <T3>Subsection (i)_APR may change. </T3>Creditors are required to statethat the APR may change and that the payment or term may change due tothe fact that the APR is variable.<T3>Subsection (ii)_APR includes only interest. </T3>A statement that theAPR does not include costs other than interest must be provided. (See thediscussion at andSection; 226.5b(d)(6) about the fact that this refers tothe APR that corresponds to the periodic rate.) <T3>Subsection (iii)_Index information.</T3> Creditors have to identifythe index used to determine rate adjustments and a source of informationabout the index. (See the comments accompanying andSection; 226.5b(f)(1)for further discussion of what constitutes a source of information.) <T3>Subsection (iv)_How the APR is determined.</T3> Creditors have to describehow the APR will be determined (for example, by stating that a margin isadded to the index value). This provision does not require disclosure ofthe specific amount of the margin. <T3>Subsection (v)_``Ask about'' current rate information.</T3> Becausethe disclosure forms can be preprinted and rate information may not becurrent, consumers will be told to ``ask about'' the current index value,margin, discount or premium (if applicable), and APR. <T3>Subsection (vi)_Discounted or premium rate.</T3> If the initial rateis discounted or is a premium, a disclosure of that fact as well as theperiod the discounted or premium rate will be in effect must be provided.<T3>Subsection (vii)_Frequency of changes in the APR.</T3> The frequencyof changes in the APR must be stated, for example, monthly or quarterly.<T3>Subsection (viii)_Rules relating to index value, APR and related changes.</T3>Rules relating to changes in the index value and the APR and resultingchanges in the payment amount must be set forth. This provision requiresan explanation of preferred-rate provisions in variable-rate plans, wherethe rate will increase not only when the index increases but also uponthe occurrence of some event, such as the borrower-employee leaving thecreditor's employ, or the consumer closing an existing account with thecreditor. Similarly, an explanation must be given if the plan permits theconsumer to switch from a variable rate to a fixed rate, including disclosureof whether a fee may be imposed for such a change. Any payment limitationsand the possibility of rate carryover also must be provided. <T3>Subsection (ix)_Rate limitations.</T3> The proposal required a statementof any annual limitations on rate increases. Several commenters raisedconcerns about how to comply if their rate caps were not expressed as annuallimits (for example, if there were only monthly caps). In response to thisconcern, the regulation provides that an annual cap must be stated if thereis one, and that a rate cap for a shorter period can be stated insteadif there is no annual cap. Caps for shorter periods must be stated in termsof a specific amount of time (for example, six-month limitations). A limitbased on twelve monthly billing cycles should be treated as an annual cap.If there are no annual (or shorter) limits on rate increases, the factthat there is no annual limit must be stated. The maximum rate that may be imposed under each payment option over thelife of the plan also must be provided. The life of the plan includes thedraw period and any repayment period that is provided for in the originalagreement. This rate may be stated as a specific rate (for example, 18%)or as a stated amount above an initial rate (for example, 5 percentagepoints above the initial interest rate). In either circumstance, creditorsmay use a range of the lowest and highest rate limitations that may beapplicable in disclosing both the periodic limitations and the maximumoverall rate in the early disclosures given at application. Creditors thatdisclose the caps as ranges and creditors that disclose the maximum rateas a stated amount above an initial rate must include a statement thatthe consumer should ask about the rate limitations that are currently applicable.This statement may be included with the other features consumers are toldto ask about under andSection; 226.5b(d)(12)(v). <T3>Subsection (x)_Maximum payment example.</T3> Creditors must show theminimum periodic payment required when the maximum rate for each paymentoption is in effect, based on a $10,000 outstanding balance. (See the discussionin andSection; 226.5b(d)(5) for circumstances in which creditors may usea lower outstanding balance.) If a range is used to disclose the maximumcap under andSection; 226.5b(d)(12)(ix), the highest rate in the range mustbe used for this disclosure. The disclosure also must state the earliesttime the maximum rate could be imposed; this would reflect, for example,the effect of periodic rate caps. As an alternative to making disclosures based on each payment option, creditorsmay choose a representative example within the three categories of paymentoptions upon which to base this disclosure. (See the discussion at andSection;226.5b(d)(5).) However, separate examples must be provided for the drawperiod and for any repayment period unless the payment is determined thesame way in both periods. In a single payment open-end reverse mortgage, creditors should assumethat the APR reaches the maximum as quickly as permitted under the planand that the maximum rate stays in effect until repayment is called for.(See the discussion at andSection; 226.5b(d)(5) concerning the other assumptionsthat the creditor should make in disclosing RAMs.) <T3>Subsection (xi)_Historical example.</T3> A 15-year historical table,based on an assumed $10,000 initial extension of credit and showing howthe APRs and payments would have been affected by the index value changesunder the plan, must be provided. (See the discussion in andSection; 226.5b(d)(5)for circumstances in which a creditor may use a lower outstanding balance.)Index values and APRs must be shown for the entire 15 years and must bebased on the most recent 15 years. If the length of the plan is less than15 years, however, payments need only be shown for as long as the planlasts. If the values for an index have not been available for 15 years,creditors need only go back as far as the values have been available ingiving the history and may start the example at the year for which valuesare first available. In providing this information, creditors should assumethat the $10,000 balance is an advance taken at the beginning of the firstbilling cycle and is reduced according to the terms of the plan. Creditorsshould assume that the consumer takes no subsequent draws. (If relevant,the creditor may assume the $10,000 is both the advance and the creditlimit.) The history must reflect the method of choosing values for the plan. Forinstance, if an average of index values is used in the plan, averages wouldbe used in the history, but if an index value as of a particular date isused a single index value would be shown. The creditor is required to assumeone date within a year (or one period, if an average is used) on whichto base the history of index values for each loan plan. The creditor maychoose to use index values as of any date or period as long as the indexvalue as of this date or period is used for each year in the index history.Only one index value per year need be shown, even if the plan providesfor adjustments to the APR or payment more than once in a year. In suchcases, the creditor can assume that the index rate remained constant forthe full year for the purpose of calculating the APR and payment. Updatingwill be necessary only once each year to reflect the most recent year'sindex value. To assist creditors in constructing histories of certain commonindices, the Board is publishing in this notice tables of index valuesfor commonly used indices.The payment figures in the example must reflect all significant programterms. For example, features such as rate and payment caps, a discountedAPR, negative amortization, and rate carryover must be taken into accountin calculating the payment figures if these would have been applicable.Both periodic and overall rate limitations must be reflected in the example.If ranges of rate limitations are provided under andSection; 226.5b(d)(12)(ix),the highest annual and overall rates must be used in the example. Ratelimitations that may apply more often than annually should be treated asif they were annual limitations. For example, if a creditor imposes a 1%cap every six months, this should be reflected in the example as if itwere a 2% annual cap. Creditors need show only one payment per year in the table, even thoughpayments may vary during a year. (The calculations, however, should bebased on the actual payment computation formula.) Creditors may assumethat payments are made on the last day of the billing cycle, the billingdate or the payment due date. Creditors must be consistent in the mannerof selecting the month that is used to illustrate payment information.A few commenters asked whether annual balance information or balloon paymentscould be added to the table. Information about the remaining balance andany balloon payment may, but need not, be reflected in the table. Creditors need not provide the required historical disclosure for all oftheir various payment options, but may select a representative paymentoption within each of the three categories of payments upon which to basetheir disclosure. (See the discussion at andSection; 226.5b(d)(5).) An historical example is required for single payment plans such as RAMs.Although 15 years of index values and APRs would be shown, the paymentcolumn would be blank until the year that the single payment would be required,assuming that payment is estimated to occur within 15 years. (See the discussionat andSection; 226.5b(d)(5) for additional guidance in making RAM disclosures,including the assumptions to be made about the term for repayment.) A value for the margin must be assumed in order to prepare the example.Creditors must select a margin that they have used during the six monthspreceding preparation of the disclosures and state that the margin is onethat they have used recently. The margin selected may be used until thecreditor annually updates the disclosure form to reflect the most recent15 years of index values. Similarly, if the home equity plan has a discountedor premium initial rate, creditors will be permitted to select a discountor premium that has been used during the six months preceding preparationof the disclosures, and should disclose that the discount or premium isone that the creditor has used recently. The discount or premium shouldbe reflected in the example for as long as it is in effect. A creditormay assume that a discount or premium that will be in effect for part ofa year is in effect for the entire year for purposes of reflecting it inthe example. In setting forth the historical example under this section, creditors thatchoose to provide disclosures about the repayment phase as part of theearly disclosures (see the general discussion about conversion under andSection;226.5b) must reflect all features of the repayment phase in the table,including the appropriate index values, margin, length of the phase, andpayments. For example, if different indices are used during the draw andrepayment phases, the index values for that portion of the 15 years thatreflects the repayment phase must be the values for the appropriate index.Creditors who choose to provide information about the repayment phase atthe time the plan converts to the repayment phase, rather than with theearly disclosures, need not reflect the repayment phase in the table (justas they may omit information about the repayment phase for purposes ofall the disclosures under andSection; 226.5b(d)(12)). In such cases, theindex values and APRs relating to the draw period would be shown for theentire 15 years (even if the draw period is less than 15 years). Section 226.5b(e)_Brochure Section 226.5b(e) requires both creditors and third parties providing applicationsto furnish consumers with a brochure prepared by the Board describing homeequity plans, or a suitable substitute. The Board's brochure (which isexpected to be published by the end of June 1989) describes home equityplans, including the potential advantages and disadvantages. The brochurealso provides guidance on how to compare home equity plans with closed-endcredit. The Board envisions that any substitutes must be comparable insubstance and comprehensiveness, recognizing that some lenders' brochuresmay contain more detailed descriptions of their particular home equityprograms than contained in the Board's brochure. The regulation requires third parties to provide consumers with the brochureif an application is given to the consumer by the third party. The Boardbelieves, however, that requiring a second brochure to be given by thecreditor in such circumstances is unnecessary. Therefore, the creditor'sduty to provide the brochure will be met if the third party provides thebrochure to the consumer. This will avoid duplication. A number of commenters misunderstood this provision in the proposal, thinkingthat the Board was attempting to make creditors directly liable for a dutythat the act places on the third party. In fact, this provision does notaffect the duty of the third party but merely relieves creditors of theneed to give a second brochure to the consumer on condition that the creditorensures that the brochure was actually given. If a creditor does not wishto rely on the actions of the third party, it of course may provide a copyof the brochure. Section 226.5b(f)_Limitations on home equity plans The substantive limitations in andSection; 226.5b(f) apply to both actionscreditors may take and the provisions that they include in contracts. Theselimitations apply to assignees and holders as well as the original creditor.The substantive rules apply to both the draw period and to any repaymentperiod that is provided for by the initial agreement. (If the agreementdoes not call for a repayment period, and the parties subsequently enterinto a closed-end transaction to pay off the outstanding balance, the lateragreement is not subject to the substantive limitations.) Section 226.5b(f)(1)_Changing the APR Under andSection; 226.5b(f)(1), a creditor may change the APR after the planis opened only if the change is based on an index outside the creditor'scontrol and the index value is available to the public. This provisionprohibits a creditor from using its own prime rate or its own ``cost offunds'' or simply retaining the right to change rates at its discretion.A creditor is permitted, however, to use the prime rate published in apublication or a newspaper, such as the <T3>Wall Street Journal,</T3> for example, even if the bank's own primerate is one of several rates used to establish that rate. A creditor alsomay use any other index not within the creditor's control. A publicly availableindex need not always be published in a newspaper, but the creditor mustmake certain that a consumer could independently verify any rate information.This provision does not prohibit specific rate changes if set forth inthe initial contract, such as in preferred rate and step rate plans, asprovided under andSection; 226.5b(f)(3)(i). Section 226.5b(f)(2)_Termination and acceleration Under andSection; 226.5b(f)(2), creditors are prohibited from terminatingan account and accelerating payment of the outstanding balance prior tothe scheduled expiration of the plan. If a creditor offers an ``evergreen''account, that is, one that has a potentially indefinite draw period, acreditor may not terminate the plan or accelerate payment of the balance.There are three exceptions to the rule against termination and acceleration.First, a creditor may terminate the plan if there has been fraud or materialmisrepresentation by the consumer in connection with the plan. This exceptionincludes fraud or misrepresentation at any time, either during the applicationprocess or during the draw period and any repayment period. What constitutesfraud or misrepresentation is determined by State law and the agreementbetween the parties and may include acts of omission, as well as overtacts, as long as any necessary intent on the part of the consumer exists.Second, a creditor may terminate the plan and accelerate the balance ifthe consumer has failed to meet the repayment terms of the agreement. Thisprovision permits termination if the consumer actually fails to make payments.A creditor may not terminate a plan if, for example, the consumer, in error,sends a payment to the wrong location, such as a branch rather than themain office of the creditor. Filing for bankruptcy may permit termination,if the consumer fails to make payments under the plan. Finally, a creditor is permitted to terminate and accelerate if the consumeracts or fails to act in a way that adversely affects the creditor's securityfor the plan, or any right of the creditor in such security. In responseto commenters, the Board has revised the regulation to more closely parallelthe language used in the statute with regard to the creditor's rights inthe security. The regulation limits the exception to action or inactionby the consumer (and not third parties) as provided in the statute. This provision permits termination, for example, if the consumer transferstitle to the property or sells the property without the permission of thecreditor, or if the consumer fails to maintain required insurance on thedwelling. This exception also may be invoked if the consumer commits wasteor otherwise destructively uses or fails to maintain the property suchthat it adversely affects the security.Failure to pay taxes on the property or some other action by the consumerresulting in the filing of a lien senior to that held by the creditor alsomight impair the creditor's security. Death of the consumer and takingof property through eminent domain both permit termination since the titleto the property transfers as a result. Commenters asked whether eventssuch as the filing of a judgment against the consumer or illegal use ofthe property would permit termination. The Board believes that whetherthe creditor can terminate an account depends on the circumstances. Forexample, the filing of a judgment against the consumer would permit thecreditor to terminate the plan if the amount of the judgment and collateralsubject to the judgment is such that the creditor's security is adverselyaffected. Foreclosure by a prior lienholder would permit termination ofthe line if the creditor's security interest is adversely affected. If an event occurs which allows termination and acceleration, a creditormay take action short of terminating an account and accelerating paymentof the outstanding balance. Commenters raised a number of questions aboutthe permissible extent of such action. Under the final regulation, if oneof the exceptions would apply, a creditor is permitted to temporarily orpermanently prohibit additional extensions of creditor or reduce the creditlimit without demanding payment in full. In addition, a creditor may takeother action; for example, the creditor may change the payment terms ormay require the consumer to pay a fee if the consumer fails to maintainrequired property insurance and the creditor subsequently purchases theinsurance. A creditor may provide in its agreement that a higher rate orhigher fees apply, for example, if the consumer fails to meet the repaymentterms or otherwise acts so that the creditor is permitted to terminatethe plan and accelerate the balance. Furthermore, a creditor that doesnot immediately and permanently terminate an account and accelerate paymentor take another permitted action may take such action at a later time,if the condition constituting an exception under andSection; 226.5b(f)(2)still exists at that time (or if another of the exceptions applies).Creditors are not permitted to specify in their contracts any other eventsthat allow terminating an account or accelerating payment of the outstandingbalance beyond those listed in the regulation. Thus, for example, the contractmay not contain a demand provision that may be exercised before the endof the stated term nor may it provide that the account will be terminatedand the balance accelerated if the rate cap is reached.Section 226.5b(f)(3)_Change of termsSection 226.5b(f)(3) provides that a creditor in general may not changethe terms under the plan after the account has been opened. Generally,a creditor may not increase any fee or impose a new fee once the plan hasbeen opened. There are several exceptions to the rule prohibiting the creditorfrom changing the terms of the plan after it has been opened. <T3>Subsection (i)_Events provided for in the contract. </T3>This provisionpermits a creditor to implement specific changes set forth in the contractthat are contemplated on the occurrence of a specific event. Both the triggeringevent and the resulting modification must be stated with specificity. Forexample, in an employee loan program, the contract could provide that aspecified higher rate_or specified higher margin in a variable-rate plan_willapply if the borrower's employment with the creditor ends. A creditor alsocould have a step rate or step fee schedule in which specified changesin the rate or the fees are set to occur on certain dates or at specifiedtime periods. A creditor also may provide in the initial agreement thatit will be entitled to a share of the appreciation in the value of theproperty as long as the specific percentage of the appreciation and thespecific circumstances in which it must be paid are set forth. A contractalso may permit a consumer to switch among minimum payment options duringthe plan. This option could be provided in the initial agreement (as longas the specific features are described) or could be offered after the planis opened since it would constitute a ``beneficial change'' as discussedin andSection; 226.5b(f)(3)(iv). Because this provision applies only to specific changes that are contemplatedon the occurrence of specific events, the regulation does not permit acreditor to include a general provision in its contract permitting changesto any or all of the terms of the plan. For example, creditors may notinclude ``boilerplate'' language in the agreement stating that they reservethe right to change the fees imposed under the plan. The regulation also does not permit a creditor to include in the initialagreement any ``triggering events'' <T3>or </T3>permissible responses that the regulation expressly addresses.Based on public comment, the proposal may not have been clear on whetherthe prohibition was intended to cover the inclusion of triggering events,or responses, or both. The Board intends that both be covered. For example,an agreement may not provide that the margin in a variable-rate plan willincrease if there is a material change in the consumer's financial circumstances,since the triggering event (a material change in the consumer's financialcircumstances) is set forth in the regulation and the permissible response(freezing the line or lowering the credit limit) is spelled out. Similarlya contract cannot contain a provision allowing the creditor to freeze aline due to an insignificant decrease in property value since the regulationallows that response only for a significant decrease. A creditor may notfreeze the line, reduce the credit limit, terminate the plan, or acceleratethe balance except in those circumstances specified in the regulation,since such consequences are set forth in the regulation. The Board solicited comment in the proposal on whether creditors shouldbe permitted to specify a second index (for variable-rate plans) in theinitial agreement, which would be used should the original index becomeunavailable. Based on further analysis, the Board believes the statutedoes not permit such an action since it expressly provides the conditionsthat must be met to substitute an index when the original index becomesunavailable. The Board has modified the requirement for this second index,however, as set forth under andSection; 226.5b(f)(3)(ii), to provide greaterflexibility to lenders if the original index becomes unavailable.<T3>Subsection (ii)_Substitution of index.</T3> This provision providesthat the creditor may change the index and margin used under the plan ifthe original index becomes unavailable, as long as historical fluctuationsin the two indices were substantially similar, and as long as the new indexand margin will produce a rate similar to the rate that was in effect atthe time the original index became unavailable. If the new index is newlyestablished and therefore does not have any historical rate history, creditorsmay nevertheless use it as long as the new index and margin produce aninterest rate substantially similar to the rate in effect when the originalindex became unavailable. <T3>Subsection (iii)_Changes made by written agreement.</T3> The regulationprohibits unilateral changes; it permits creditors to change the termsafter a plan is opened provided the consumer expressly agrees in writingto the change at that time. Thus, for example, under this subsection aconsumer and a creditor could agree in writing to change the repaymentterms from interest-only payments to payments that reduce the principalbalance. Any subsequent agreement must be consistent with the rules set out in andSection;226.5b(f). For example, a creditor and consumer could not enter into anagreement to base changes in the APR on the movement of an index controlledby the creditor, because andSection; 226.5b(f)(1) provides that any indexused as a basis for APR changes must be one not under the creditor's control.Similarly, an agreement could not specify events that will permit terminationand acceleration beyond those set forth in the regulation. In addition, creditors are not permitted to assume consent because theconsumer uses an account, even if use of an account constitutes acceptanceunder state law. The Board believes this restriction will carry out theCongressional intent to limit changes after a plan is opened, yet accommodatethe need for adjustments explicitly agreed to by the consumer. <T3>Subsection (iv)_Beneficial changes.</T3> This provision permits creditorsto make changes, after the plan has been entered into, that ``unequivocallybenefit'' the consumer as long as the change is beneficial for the entireterm of the agreement. In response to suggestions by commenters, the Boardis providing additional examples of beneficial changes. A creditor maymake changes that offer more options to consumers, as long as existingoptions remain. For example, a creditor could offer the consumer the optionof making lower monthly payments or could increase the credit limit (althoughthe right of rescission under andSection; 226.15 may apply if the creditlimit is increased). Similarly, a creditor could extend the length of theplan, as long as it was extended or renewed on the same terms. Creditorsare permitted to temporarily reduce the rate or fees charged under a plan.The rate or fees, however, may not later be increased to a level higherthan that initially disclosed. (If fees are later increased up to the originallevel, creditors may need to comply with the requirements in andSection;226.9(c) concerning notification of changes in terms.) Creditors also mayadd additional means to access the line even if fees are associated withusing the device, provided that the consumer retains the ability to useprior access devices on the original terms. <T3>Subsection (v)_Insignificant changes.</T3> This subsection providesan exception to the general prohibition against changing terms after theplan has been entered into for changes to ``insignificant terms.'' Thisis intended to address operational and similar problems, such as changingthe address of the creditor for purposes of sending payments. In responseto commenters, the Board is providing additional examples of items thatwould constitute insignificant changes. The provision permits minor changesto features such as the billing cycle date, the payment due date (as longas the consumer does not have a diminished grace period if one is provided),and the day of the month on which index values are used to determine changesto the rate for variable-rate plans. A creditor also may change its roundingrules, in accordance with the tolerance rules set forth in andSection; 226.14.For example, a creditor may change its rules to state an exact APR of 14.3333percent as 14.3 percent, even if it previously stated the APR as 14.33percent. A creditor may change the balance computation method it uses onlyif the change produces an insignificant difference in the finance chargepaid by the consumer. For example, a creditor may switch from using thedaily balance method (including new purchases) to the average daily balancemethod (including new purchases). This exception would not permit a creditorto unilaterally change a term such as a fee charged for late payments.<T3>Subsection (vi)_Temporary suspensions of credit and reduction of creditlimit.</T3> This subsection provides that a creditor may temporarily prohibitadditional extensions of credit or reduce the credit limit in seven circumstances.First, a creditor may take such action if the value of the dwelling thatsecures the plan declines significantly below the property's appraisedvalue for purposes of the plan. A number of commenters asked the Boardto provide guidance on what constitutes a ``significant'' decline in theproperty. The Board believes what constitutes a significant decline willvary according to individual circumstances. In any event, however, if thevalue of the dwelling declines such that the initial difference betweenthe credit limit and the available equity (based on the property's appraisedvalue for purposes of the plan) is reduced by fifty percent, that willbe deemed a significant decline in the value of the dwelling for purposesof the regulation. For example, assume that a house with a first mortgageof $50,000 is appraised at $100,000 and the credit limit is $30,000. Thedifference between the credit limit and the available equity is $20,000.Therefore, the creditor could prohibit further advances if the value ofthe property declines from $100,000 to $90,000. Second, a creditor may prohibit additional extensions of credit or reducethe credit line if the creditor reasonably believes the consumer will beunable to fulfill the repayment obligations under the plan due to a materialchange in the consumer's financial circumstances. Two conditions must bemet for a creditor to use this exception. First, there must be a ``materialchange'' in the consumer's financial circumstances. For example, a significantdecrease in the consumer's income could meet this part of the requirement.Second, as a result of this change, the creditor must have a reasonablebelief that the consumer will be unable to fulfill the payment obligationsof the plan. This second condition has been modified from the proposal.A creditor does not have to rely on specific ``evidence'' (such as thefailure to pay other debts) to meet this test. This provision does require,however, that the creditor have some basis for believing that the consumerwill be unable to make payments under the plan.The third exception permits a creditor to prohibit additional extensionsof credit or reduce the credit line if the consumer is in default of anymaterial obligations under the agreement. The regulation does not definewhat qualifies as a default of a material obligation. Some commenters requestedthat the regulation provide examples of what is a material default. A numberof other commenters, however, expressly asked that the regulation not defineor provide examples of this provision. They stated that any definitionor use of examples might limit the conditions considered a default of amaterial obligation. The fourth exception permits a creditor to prohibit additional advancesor reduce the credit line if action by a governmental body precludes thecreditor from imposing the agreed-upon APR. This exception will generallyapply where, for example, a state usury law is enacted which prohibitsa creditor from imposing the APR being used at the time of the action.The fifth exception permits a creditor to prohibit additional advancesor reduce the credit line if action by a governmental body adversely affectsthe priority of the creditor's security interest to the extent that thevalue of the security interest is less than 120 percent of the amount ofthe credit line (for example, through imposition of a tax lien). The sixth exception enables creditors to suspend further advances or reducethe credit limit during any period in which the APR corresponding to theperiodic rate reaches the maximum rate allowed under the plan. This provisionpermits a creditor to suspend credit advances even if a contract containsa ``usury savings clause.'' For example, if a state enacts a rate ceilinglower than the maximum rate specified in the contract, a usury savingsclause deems the new state ceiling to be the maximum rate permitted underthe plan. Thus, the creditor may freeze the line during any period theAPR reaches that maximum rate. If the APR subsequently declines below the maximum APR, the creditor wouldhave to reinstate credit privileges. This provision was contained in andSection;226.5b(f)(3)(i) of the proposal. It has been expanded to allow reductionin the credit limit as well as freezing of advances and therefore is partof andSection; 226.5b(f)(3)(vi) which governs temporary suspensions. Finally, a seventh exception has been added which permits a creditor toprohibit additional advances or reduce the credit line due to certain governmentalactions. Several commenters expressed the concern that, because of therestriction on termination and change in terms, they might be requiredto continue to extend credit even when a federal or state regulatory agencyhad provided a notice that future extensions could constitute an unsafeand unsound banking practice. To avoid this problem the Board is addinga provision allowing a creditor to temporarily suspend further advancesor reduce the credit limit when a regulatory agency with responsibilityfor supervising the creditor provides notification that continuing to advancefunds may constitute an unsafe and unsound practice. The Board believesthis limited exception is analogous to the statutory provisions which providethat a creditor may prohibit additional advances as a result of specifiedgovernment actions. Under the regulation, creditors are permitted to prohibit additional extensionsof credit or reduce the credit limit only as long as any of these sevencircumstances exist. Thus, for example, if the creditor cuts off furtheradvances due to a significant decline in the value of the dwelling andduring the length of the draw period the value of the dwelling subsequentlyincreases, the creditor would have to reinstate drawing privileges. Ifa second event occurs that would permit continuing the freeze, of course,the line need not be reinstated as long as that circumstance exists. Thecreditor's right to reduce the credit limit does not permit reducing thelimit below the amount of the outstanding balance if this would requirethe consumer to make a higher payment. (Section 226.9(c)(3) provides thata creditor must notify the consumer of the decision to freeze the lineor reduce the credit limit.) Several commenters asked whether the creditor is required to automaticallyreinstate credit privileges when the circumstances allowing suspensioncease to exist; they pointed out that some state laws provide that futureadvances ``relate back'' to the mortgage only if the creditor is obligatedto make advances. The concern was expressed that any advances made afterthe suspension may not have priority over intervening liens. If there areintervening liens in such a case, the exception provided in section 226.5b(f)(2)(iii)for consumer action that adversely affects the creditor's security interestwould apply. Therefore, the creditor could refuse to make further advancesdue to the intervening lien resulting from consumer action. A number of commenters asked the Board to provide guidance as to when creditprivileges have to be reinstated. They were most concerned about havingto constantly monitor accounts, particularly in cases where the consumeris in the best position to know if the circumstances triggering the freezehave changed. Because the statute states that freezing the line can be only temporary,creditors have the responsibility of ensuring that the freeze is temporary.The creditor must monitor on a regular basis and reinstate credit privilegesas soon as reasonably possible if the condition that permitted the creditorto take such action ceases to exist. As an alternative to this ongoing duty. the Board is providing that thecreditor may shift the initial duty to the consumer to request reinstatementof credit privileges. In this circumstance, when the creditor notifiesthe consumer of action taken, as discussed in andSection; 226.9(c)(3), thecreditor also must inform the consumer at the same time that reinstatementof credit privileges must be requested by the consumer. Once the consumerhas made such a request, the creditor must investigate and determine whetherthe condition allowing the freeze has changed. This section does not prohibit a lender from refusing to permit advanceson a line if specifically requested to do so by a consumer. Thus, for example,if two consumers are obligated under a plan and each has the ability totake advances, the agreement may permit either of the two persons to directthe creditor not to make further advances; this section permits the creditorto honor such a request. This may be done only at the express request ofone of the parties obligated under the plan. If that person subsequentlyrequests reinstatement of draw privileges, the creditor must honor sucha request, unless an event set forth in andSection; 226.5b(f)(2) or andSection;226.5b(f)(3) permits a continued freeze or other action. Section 226.5b(g)_Refund of Fees Section 226.5b(g) imposes a duty on a creditor to refund all fees paidby the consumer in connection with an application if any term disclosedchanges (other than one resulting from a variable rate index change) betweenthe time the early disclosures are provided to the consumer and the timethe plan is opened, and if, as a result of the change, the consumer decidesto not enter into the plan. If a refund is required, it applies to allfees paid in connection with the plan, such as credit report fees, appraisalfees, and insurance premiums, whether such fees are paid directly to thecreditor or to third parties. This requirement applies whether or not termsare guaranteed by the creditor under andSection; 226.5b(d)(2)(i). If a disclosure, such as the maximum rate cap, is stated as a range inthe early disclosures, and the rate cap ultimately applicable to a planfalls within that range, a change will not be deemed to occur for purposesof this section. If, however, no range is used and the cap is changed,for example, from 5 to 6 percentage points over the initial rate, thischange would permit the consumer to obtain a refund of fees. (See the discussionin andSection; 226.5b(d)(2) dealing with changes in the maximum rate if tiedto an initial variable rate.)The fact that a term is stated in the early disclosures as an estimatedoes not render this section inapplicable if the term ultimately differsfrom that disclosed. For example, in the case of fees imposed by the creditordescribed in andSection; 226.5b(d)(7), an increase in those fees_even ifthey were stated as estimates in the early disclosures_would entitle theconsumer to a refund if the consumer decides not to enter into the planbecause of that increase. In the case of the estimated disclosure of feesimposed by third parties under andSection; 226.5b(d)(8), however, a changewill not be deemed to occur even if the fees increase later. As in allcases, however, creditors must use the best information available in providingdisclosures about such fees. The refund of fees must be made as soon as reasonably possible after thecreditor is notified that the consumer is not entering into the plan becauseof the changed term, or that the consumer wants a refund of fees. Somecommenters questioned the relationship between this provision and the requirementthat application fees be charged to all applicants in order to be excludedfrom the finance charge (pursuant to comment 4(c)(1)-1 of the OfficialStaff Commentary to Regulation Z). Refunding fees under this section doesnot affect that test. The right to a refund of fees under this provision is distinct from theexisting right of rescission under andSection; 226.15, which applies onlywhen a plan secured by the consumer's principal dwelling is opened. Section 226.5b(h)_Imposition of nonrefundable fees Under andSection; 226.5b(h) neither the creditor nor any other party mayimpose a nonrefundable fee in connection with an application until threebusiness days after the disclosures and brochure have been provided tothe consumer. If disclosures are mailed to the consumer, footnote 10d ofthe regulation provides that a nonrefundable fee may not be imposed untilsix business days after the mailing. Several creditors asked whether arefundable fee can become nonrefundable. A refundable fee may become nonrefundableafter the three-day period expires. If a fee is collected before the consumerreceives the disclosures, the fee must be refunded if, within three daysof receiving the disclosures, the consumer decides not to enter into theagreement. The interaction of this provision with existing rules as well as otherparts of the new rules is complex. Comment 5(b)(1)-1 provides that thecreditor cannot collect a fee_except an application fee or a refundablemembership fee_prior to the time the creditor provides the disclosuresunder andSection; 226.6. Since membership fees may be collected prior toproviding the andSection; 226.6 disclosures only if they remain refundable(and since other fees such as appraisal and credit report fees may notbe collected prior to providing the andSection; 226.6 disclosures) the practicaleffect of andSection; 226.5b(h) as to the fees collected by the creditoris limited to application fees, which may be collected at any time_providedthey remain refundable until three business days after the consumer receivesthe andSection; 226.5b disclosures. After the three-day period expires, anapplication fee may become nonrefundable except that, under andSection; 226.5b(g),it must be refunded if the consumer elects not to enter into the plan becauseof a change in terms. (In addition, of course, all fees, including applicationfees, must be refunded if the consumer later rescinds under andSection; 226.15.)Section 226.6_Initial Disclosure Statement Section 226.6(e)_Home equityplan information In addition to the early disclosures given with an application, the amendmentsrequire certain additional disclosures at the time of opening a plan. Section226.6(e) requires creditors to provide a few of the disclosures set forthin andSection; 226.5b(d) along with the disclosures currently required underandSection; 226.6. Creditors also must disclose a list of the conditionsthat permit the creditor to terminate the plan, freeze or reduce the creditlimit, and implement specified modifications to the original terms. Thisrequirement can be met by providing a separate list or by identifying theprovisions in the contract which contain such conditions. (See the discussionunder andSection; 226.5b(d)(4) regarding the form of this information.) Thedisclosures must be provided prior to the first transaction under the plan,in accordance with the existing rule in andSection; 226.5(b). Whereas the proposal stated that andSection; 226.5b disclosures that duplicateexisting andSection; 226.6 disclosures need not be given, the final rulestates specifically which disclosures must be given at the later time.Creditors have to provide, as applicable: (1) A statement of the conditionsunder which the creditor may terminate the plan or change the terms asdescribed in andSection; 226.5b(d)(4)(i); (2) the information in andSection;andSection;226.5b(d)(5) (i) and (ii) relating to the payment terms of the plan (includingboth the draw period and any repayment period); (3) the information inandSection; 226.5b(d)(9) relating to negative amortization; (4) the informationin andSection; 226.5b(d)(10) relating to transaction requirements; (5) theinformation in andSection; 226.5b(d)(11) relating to tax implications; and(6) a statement that the APR corresponding to the periodic rate imposedunder the plan does not include costs other than interest. Creditors also have to provide the payment example disclosure under andSection;226.5b(d)(5)(iii) and the variable-rate information under andSection;andSection;226.5b(d)(12) (viii), (x), (xi), and (xii) unless the following conditionsare met: (1) The early disclosures were provided in a form a consumer couldkeep; and (2) the early disclosures of the payment example under andSection;226.5b(d)(5)(iii), the ``worst case'' example under andSection; 226.5b(d)(12)(x)and the historical table under andSection; 226.5b(d)(12)(xi) included a representativepayment example for the category of payment options the consumer has chosen.For example, if a creditor offers three payment options (one in each ofthe categories described in andSection; 226.5b(d)(5)) and describes all threeoptions in its early disclosures and provides the disclosures in a retainableform, that creditor need not provide the andSection; 226.5b(d)(5)(iii) or226.5b(d)(12) disclosures again when the account is opened. If the creditorshowed only one of the three options in the early disclosures (which wouldbe the case if it chose to give a separate disclosure form rather thana combined form, as discussed under andSection; 226.5b(a)), the andSection;226.5b(d)(5)(iii) information and andSection;andSection; 226.5b(d)(12) (viii),(x), (xi) and (xii) disclosures must be given to any consumer who choseone of the other two options. If the andSection; 226.5b(d)(5)(iii) and andSection;226.5b(d)(12) disclosures are provided with the second set of disclosures,they need not be transaction-specific, but may be based on a representativeexample of the category of payment option chosen. In cases where the creditor has included complete information about boththe draw and repayment phases in the andSection; 226.5(b) disclosures givenat application, the creditor should similarly make disclosures about bothphases when giving the second set. In particular, such a creditor mustinclude the disclosures in andSection; 226.6(e) and the information requiredin footnote 12 (dealing with any variable-rate feature) for the repaymentphase. On the other hand, if the creditor defers providing the bulk of the andSection;226.5b disclosures for the repayment phase until conversion, the creditordoes not have to provide any information about the repayment period underandSection; 226.6 other than the basic payment items listed in andSection;226.6(e)(2). Thus, for example, if the disclosures are delayed, the creditorwould not have to give the variable-rate information set out in footnote12 for the repayment phase.The segregation standard set forth in andSection; 226.5b(a) does not applyto the second set of disclosures provided by the creditor prior to thefirst transaction under the plan. Rather, they are governed by andSection;226.5(a)(1), which does not require segregation from other information.These disclosures may be integrated into the contract. In addition, thedisclosure of conditions for certain actions described in andSection; 226.5b(d)(4)(i)does not have to precede the other disclosures. Like the existing andSection;226.6 disclosures, the additional disclosures must be in a form the consumercan keep. Section 226.9_Subsequent Disclosure Requirements Section 226.9(c)_Changein terms The Board is adding a new paragraph (3) to andSection; 226.9(c) to requirecreditors to provide a notice to consumers if the creditor, under andSection;226.5b(f)(3)(vi), prohibits additional advances of credit or reduces thecredit limit. Under andSection; 226.9(c)(3), creditors have to mail or delivera written notice of the action to each consumer who is affected. The noticemay be provided within three business days after the time the action istaken, rather than in advance of the action. The creditor must notify theconsumer of the action taken, and the reason such action has been taken(for example, due to reaching the rate cap under the plan). If the creditorrequires the consumer to request reinstatement of the line, the noticeshall also include a statement to that effect. (See the discussion underandSection; 226.5b(f)(3)(vi) covering the creditor's duty with regard toreinstatement.) Section 226.14_Determination of Annual Percentage Rate Section 226.14(b)_Annualpercentage rate for andSection;andSection; 226.5a and 226.5b disclosures, forinitial disclosures and for advertising purposes Section 226.14(b) is modified by adding a reference to new andSection; 226.5b.The introduction to andSection; 226.5b provides that, throughout andSection;226.5b, the term annual percentage rate is the APR as determined underandSection; 226.14(b). Section 226.14(b) is modified to reflect this provision.Section 226.14(b) also is modified to refer generally to andSection;andSection;226.6 and 226.16, rather than specifically to andSection;andSection; 226.6(a)(2)and 226.16(b)(2). These provisions are modified because the APR describedin the new home equity rules (added to andSection;andSection; 226.6(e) and226.16(d)) also is calculated in accordance with the rules in andSection;226.14(b). Section 226.15_Right of Rescission Section 226.15(a)_Consumer's right torescind Section 226.15(a)(3) of the regulation states that the consumer may exercisethe right of rescission until midnight of the third business day followingthe opening of the plan, delivery of the notice of the right to rescind,or delivery of all ``material disclosures,'' whichever occurs last. Footnote36 to this section contains the definition of material disclosures. Inthe proposal, the Board requested comment on whether to add to the definitioncertain payment information provided under andSection; 226.6(e). The Boardis amending footnote 36 to provide that the payment terms required underandSection; 226.6(e)(2) be treated as a ``material disclosure'' for purposesof the right of rescission. Including such payment terms in the definitionof ``material disclosures'' is consistent with what constitutes materialdisclosures in the closed-end credit rescission provisions, and the statutorydefinition of material disclosures. In addition the Board believes thatpayment information is important for a consumer to know in order to decidewhether to exercise the right of rescission. Neither the payment termsnor any other information given with the first set of disclosures at thetime of application is a material disclosure for purposes of rescission.Section 226.16_Advertising Section 226.16(d)_Additional advertising requirementsfor home equity plans Under andSection; 226.16(d)(1), any reference to a payment term in a homeequity advertisement for the draw period or any repayment period (includingthe length of the plan and any reference to how the minimum payments aredetermined and the timing of such payments) will ``trigger'' further disclosures,including loan fees, estimates of other fees that may be imposed, and,for variable-rate plans, the maximum rate that may be imposed under theplan. Furthermore, if any of the ``triggers'' set forth in andSection; 226.6 (a)or (b) or any payment information is stated affirmatively or negatively,further disclosures must be given. For example, if a creditor states ``noannual fee'' or ``no points'' in an advertisement, additional informationmust be provided. Section 226.16(d)(2) provides that if an advertisement states a ``discounted''APR or a ``premium'' APR it must state in equal prominence the APR derivedby use of the fully-indexed value. Section 226.16(d)(3) provides that,if an advertisement contains a reference to any payment amount, it muststate, if applicable, that the plan contains a balloon payment. (See footnote10b accompanying andSection; 226.5b(d)(5) for a discussion of when a balloonpayment results.) Under andSection; 226.16(d)(4) of the regulation, if an advertisement statesthat any interest under the plan may be tax deductible, the advertisementmust not be misleading about such deductibility. For example, an advertisementreferring to deductibility would not be misleading if it includes a statementthat the consumer should consult a tax advisor regarding the deductibilityof interest. Creditors are prohibited by andSection; 226.16(d)(5) from referring to homeequity plans as ``free money,'' or from using other misleading terms. Forexample, an advertisement could not state ``no closing costs'' if consumersmay be required to pay any closing costs, such as recordation fees. Several commenters asked how this new section relates to the other advertisingrules. Advertisements for home equity plans must comply with all provisionsin andSection; 226.16, including andSection; 226.16(b), not solely the newandSection; 226.16(d). Several commenters asked whether an advertisement for a home equity planwould be required to provide information about any ``closed-end'' (repayment)phase in the ad. Even if an open-end home equity agreement provides for``conversion'' to a repayment phase (during which further advances arenot permitted), advertisements for such plans are governed exclusivelyby the requirements of andSection; 226.16, and are not covered by the closed-endadvertising rules under andSection; 226.24. Thus, if a creditor states inan advertisement payment information about the repayment phase, this willtrigger the duty to provide additional information under andSection; 226.16,but not under andSection; 226.24. <ITAG tagnum="84">(3) Effective Date </ITAG>The statute provides that the act and regulations apply to: (1) Any agreementto open a plan which is entered into five months after the regulationsbecome final; and (2) any application to open a plan which is distributedby or received by a creditor five months after regulations become final.Thus, if an application is given to a consumer on or after November 7,1989, the effective date of the new rules, the andSection; 226.5b disclosuresand the brochure must be given to the consumer according to the normalrules. If an application given to the consumer before the effective dateis received by the creditor on or after that date, the andSection; 226.5bdisclosures and the brochure must be given to the consumer but they maybe provided within three business days of receipt of the application. Ifan application is received by the creditor prior to the effective date,none of the disclosures in andSection; 226.5b or andSection; 226.6(e) or thebrochure need to be given to the consumer. The substantive rules apply to all plans opened on or after the effectivedate, no matter when the application was provided to the consumer or receivedby the creditor. Transition Rules If a home equity plan is entered into prior to November 7, 1989, andSection;226.5b does not apply to that plan. Thus neither the substantive limitationsnor the disclosure requirements apply to the plan. Furthermore, if an agreementis entered into prior to the effective date, and is renewed by the sameconsumer (with or without changes in terms) on or after the effective date,the renewed plan also is not subject to the new requirements. (Of course,creditors may have to provide a change in terms notice under andSection;226.9(c), if applicable.) However, if a line of credit not secured by aconsumer's dwelling is entered into prior to the effective date and a securityinterest in a consumer's dwelling is added to the line on or after theeffective date, the substantive provisions in andSection; 226.5b(f)_but notthe new disclosure rules_will apply to the plan from that point on. <ITAG tagnum="84">(4) Disclosure Samples and Model Clauses </ITAG>The Board is revising Appendix G of the regulation to incorporate disclosuresamples and model clauses to assist creditors in preparing disclosures.(A) <T3>Sample forms. </T3>Form G-14A illustrates a variable-rate plan witha 10-year draw period followed by a 5-year repayment period. The paymentsare based on a constant fraction of the outstanding balance so that, independentof rate changes, payments will vary each month. Accordingly, payments arestated as a range in the minimum payment example. In addition, one paymentis shown each year in the historical example and the fact that paymentswould have varied each year is stated. The monthly payment in the historicalexample is the first payment that would have been due each year, basedon the rate in effect for that year. (This assumption also has been usedin calculating the payments in Forms G-14B and G-14C.) The calculationsfor the disclosures, however, are done using the actual payment computationformula. Form G-14B illustrates a significantly more complicated plan. Three paymentoptions are available to the consumer during the draw period. Two of theseare ``interest-only'' options and one involves the payment of interestand a fixed portion of the balance. In accord with the rules set forthin the discussion of payment terms under andSection; 226.5b(d)(5), the formuses a representative example of the payment options within the ``interest-only''category. Thus the minimum payment example, the ``worst case'' exampleand the historical example are based on the monthly interest-only paymentoption. This option, as well as the fixed portion of the balance option,are both illustrated in the same historical example. In addition, form G-14B illustrates a plan with an initially discountedrate. Accordingly, the first rate in the historical example is discountedby a representative amount and the initial payments reflect the discount.Also, a different index is used during the repayment period from that usedduring the draw period, and the last five years of the historical exampleare based on the second index. Finally, form G-14B illustrates the optional rule, described in the discussionof andSection; 226.5b(d)(4), regarding the disclosure of possible creditoractions. Rather than just mentioning the possibility of termination, suspensionof advances and reduction of the credit limit and indicating that moreinformation is available, the form summarizes the provisions of andSection;andSection;226.5b(f)(2) and 226.5b(f)(3)(vi). Form G-14C illustrates the disclosures that would be provided by a creditorwho elected to provide disclosures illustrating the repayment phase ofa line at the inception of the repayment phase rather than including themin the original andSection; 226.5b disclosures given when the plan was opened.(B) <T3>Model clauses. </T3>The Board has included a number of model clausesin Appendix G-15. In these clauses, language that may or may not be applicableis enclosed in brackets. Alternative phrases are enclosed in brackets andseparated by slashes. Alternative clauses are separated by the italicizedword ``or.''<ITAG tagnum="84">(5) Tables of Certain Index Values </ITAG>To assist creditors in constructing histories of various indices used intheir home equity plans, the Board has prepared tables of values for commonlyused indices for the years 1974 through 1989. The indices chosen representthose most frequently requested by commenters. January values are shownfrom 1975 through 1989, while July values are shown for 1974 through 1988(since July values are not yet available for 1989). Earlier years in whichindex values are not available are marked ``n.a.'' Table 1 provides the values for United States Treasury securities adjustedto constant maturities of 1, 2, 3, and 5 years. Weekly average values areprovided as of the first week ending in January and in July. Table 2 providesthe January and July monthly average values for the Cost of Funds Ratioto 11th Federal Home Loan Bank District Institutions. Table 3 providesthe values as of the last business day in January and July for the primerate as published in the Wall Street Journal's Money Rates table. A singlerate is shown except in cases where multiple rates were published. (Wherea range of values are provided, creditors may base their disclosures onthe high or low value, or an average depending on their method of figuringthe rate.) Creditors need not use these tables in constructing their indexhistories. Moreover, the dates used in these tables were selected merelyto provide index values at specific points within each year. Creditorsmay choose to use the applicable index values in these tables even if indexvalues as of another date are used in their home equity plans.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>1_<T4>Constant Maturity Yield on United States Treasury Securities </T4><H1>Year</H1><H1>1 Year</H1><H1>2 Year</H1><H1>3 Year</H1><H1>5 Year</H1> <ITAG tagnum="21">Average for first week ending in January (percent)<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1975<D>7.29</D><D>n.a.</D><D>7.33</D><D>7.35 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1976<D>6.18</D><D>n.a.</D><D>7.12</D><D>7.50 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1977<D> 5.02</D><D>5.53</D><D>5.83</D><D>6.24 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1978<D>7.03</D><D>7.26</D><D>7.40</D><D>7.59 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1979<D>10.51</D><D>9.93</D><D>9.58</D><D>9.30 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1980<D>12.02</D><D>11.39</D><D>10.75</D><D>10.52 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1981<D>13.86</D><D>13.00</D><D>I2.81</D><D>12.54 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1982<D>13.68</D><D>13.88</D><D>14.09</D><D>14.04 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1983<D>8.62</D><D>9.35</D><D>9.65</D><D>10.04 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1984<D>10.02</D><D>10.77</D><D>11.04</D><D>11.50 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1985<D>9.19</D><D>10.05</D><D>10.58</D><D>11.16 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1986<D>7.63</D><D>8.01</D><D>8.25</D><D>8.50 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1987<D>5.97</D><D>6.36</D><D>6.54</D><D>6.79 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1988<D>7.15</D><D>7.82</D><D>8.08</D><D>8.38 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1989<D>9.17</D><D>9.28</D><D>9.30</D><D>9.28</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Average for first week ending in July (percent)<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1974<D>9.04</D><D>n.a.</D><D>8.46</D><D>8.42 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1975<D>6.92</D><D>n.a.</D><D>7.58</D><D>7.87 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1976<D>6.46</D><D>7.01</D><D>7.27</D><D>7.58 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1977<D>5.72</D><D>6.07</D><D>6.32</D><D>6.68 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1978<D>8.34</D><D>8.45</D><D>8.51</D><D>8.50 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1979<D>9.44</D><D>8.97</D><D>8.78</D><D>8.73 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1980<D>8.51</D><D>8.94</D><D>9.15</D><D>9.47 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1981<D>14.94</D><D>14.74</D><D>14.58</D><D>14.28 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1982<D>14.41</D><D>14.75</D><D>14.81</D><D>14.73 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1983<D>9.78</D><D>10.29</D><D>10.47</D><D>10.80 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1984<D>12.17</D><D>13.12</D><D>13.38</D><D>13.67 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1985<D>7.66</D><D>8.59</D><D>8.98</D><D>9.53 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1986<D>6.36</D><D>6.78</D><D>6.99</D><D>7.21 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1987<D>6.71</D><D>7.45</D><D>7.72</D><D>7.96 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1988<D>7.52</D><D>8.04</D><D>8.21</D><D>8.46</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table</T4> 2_<T4>Average Cost of Funds Ratio to 11th FHLB District Institutions </T4><H1>Year </H1><H1>January (percent) </H1><H1>July (percent)</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">1974<D> </D><D>n.a. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1975 <D>n.a. </D><D>n.a. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1976 <D>n.a. </D><D>n.a. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1977 <D>n.a. </D><D>n.a. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1978 <D>n.a. </D><D>n.a. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1979<D> n.a. </D><D>n.a. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1980 <D>8.76 </D><D>9.67 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1981 <D>10.45 </D><D>11.85 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1982 <D>11.95 </D><D>12.23 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1983 <D>10.46 </D><D>9.68 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1984 <D>10.03 </D><D>10.71 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1985 <D>10.22 </D><D>9.37 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1986 <D>8.77 </D><D>8.20 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1987 <D>7.40 </D><D>7.28 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1988 <D>7.62 </D><D>7.59 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1989 <D>8.13 </D><D/></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>3_ <T4>Prime Rate as Published in the Wall Street Journal </T4><H1>Year</H1><H1>January (percent)</H1><H1>July (percent)</H1>   <ITAG tagnum="1">1974<D/><D>10.75 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1975<D>9-9.5</D><D>7.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1976<D>6.75</D><D>7-7.25 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1977<D>6.25</D><D>6.5-6.75 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1978<D>8 </D><D>9 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1979<D>11.5-11.75</D><D>11.75 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1980<D>15.25</D><D>10.75-11 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1981<D>19.5-20</D><D>20.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1982<D>15.75</D><D>15.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1983<D>11</D><D>10.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1984<D>11</D><D>13 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1985<D>10.5</D><D>9.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1986<D>9.5</D><D>8 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1987<D>7.5</D><D>8.25 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1988<D>8.75</D><D>9.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1989<D>10.5</D><D/></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">(6) Economic Impact Statement </ITAG>The Board's Division of Research and Statistics has prepared an economicimpact statement on the revisions to Regulation Z. A copy of the analysismay be obtained from Publications Services, Board of Governors of the FederalReserve System, Washington, DC, 20551, at (202) 452-3245. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 12 CFR Part 226 </ITAG>Advertising; Banks; Banking; Consumer protection; Credit; Federal ReserveSystem; Finance; Penalties; Rate limitations; Truth in lending. <ITAG tagnum="84">(7) Text of Revisions </ITAG>Pursuant to authority granted in section 105 of the Truth in Lending Act(15 U.S.C. 1604 as amended), the Board is amending Regulation Z (12 CFRPart 226) as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 226_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 226 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Truth in Lending Act, 15 U.S.C. 1604 and sec. 2. Pub.L. No. 100-583, 102 Stat. 2960; sec. 1204(c), Competitive Equality BankingAct, Pub. L. 100-86, 101 Stat. 552. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General </ITAG>2. Section 226.1 is amended by revising paragraphs (b) and (d)(2) and addingparagraph (c)(3) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 226.1_Authority, Purpose, Coverage, Organization, Enforcementand Liability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) <T3>Purpose.</T3> The purpose of this regulation is to promote the informeduse of consumer credit by requiring disclosures about its terms and cost.* * * In addition, the regulation requires a maximum interest rate to bestated in variable-rate contracts secured by the consumer's dwelling, andimposes limitations on home equity plans that are subject to the requirementsof andSection; 226.5b. The regulation does not govern charges for consumercredit. (c) <T3>Coverage.</T3> * * * (3) In addition, certain requirements of andSection; 226.5b apply to personswho are not creditors but who provide applications for home equity plansto consumers. (d) <T3>Organization.</T3> * * *  (2) Subpart B contains the rules for open-end credit. It requires thatinitial disclosures and periodic statements be provided, as well as additionaldisclosures for credit and charge card applications and solicitations andfor home equity plans subject to the requirements of andSection;andSection;226.5a and 226.5b, respectively. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Open-End Credit </ITAG>3. Section 226.5 is amended by revising footnote 8 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">\8\ The disclosures required under andSection; 226.5a for credit andcharge card applications and solicitations, the home equity disclosuresrequired under andSection; 226.5b(d), the alternative summary billing rightsstatement provided for in andSection; 226.9(a)(2), the credit and chargecard renewal disclosures required under andSection; 226.9(e), and the disclosuresmade under andSection; 226.10(b) about payment requirements need not be ina form that the consumer can keep.</ITAG>3a. Section 226.5 is further amended by adding paragraphs (a)(4) and (b)(4)to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 226.5_General disclosure requirements.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>Form of disclosures.</T3> * * * (4) For rules governing the form of disclosures for home equity plans,see andSection; 226.5b(a). (b) <T3>Time of disclosures.</T3> * * * (4) <T3>Home equity plans.</T3> Disclosures for home equity plans shall bemade in accordance with the timing requirements of andSection; 226.5b(b).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG>4. Section 226.5a is amended by revising paragraph (a)(3) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 226.5a </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Credit and charge card applications and solicitations. </ITAG>(a) * * * (3) <T3>Exceptions. </T3>This section does not apply to home equity plans accessibleby a credit or charge card that are subject to the requirements of andSection;226.5b; <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>5. A new andSection; 226.5b is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 226.5b </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for home equity plans. </ITAG>The requirements of this section apply to open-end credit plans securedby the consumer's dwelling. For purposes of this section, an annual percentagerate is the annual percentage rate corresponding to the periodic rate asdetermined under andSection; 226.14(b). (a) <T3>Form of disclosures</T3>_(1) <T3>General. </T3>The disclosures required by paragraph (d) of this sectionshall be made clearly and conspicuously and shall be grouped together andsegregated from all unrelated information. The disclosures may be providedon the application form or on a separate form. The disclosure describedin paragraph (d)(4)(iii), the itemization of third-party fees describedin paragraph (d)(8), and the variable-rate information described in paragraph(d)(12) of this section may be provided separately from the other requireddisclosures. (2) <T3>Precedence of certain disclosures. </T3>The disclosures described inparagraph (d)(1) through (4)(ii) of this section shall precede the otherrequired disclosures. (b) <T3>Time of disclosures. </T3>The disclosures and brochure required byparagraphs (d) and (e) of this section shall be provided at the time anapplication is provided to the consumer.10a<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>10a The disclosures and the brochure may be delivered or placedin the mail not later than three business days following receipt of a consumer'sapplication in the case of applications contained in magazines or otherpublications, or when the application is received by telephone or throughan intermediary agent or broker. (c) <T3>Duties of third parties. </T3>Persons other than the creditor who provideapplications to consumers for home equity plans must provide the brochurerequired under paragraph (e) of this section at the time an applicationis provided. If such persons have the disclosures required under paragraph(d) of this section for a creditor's home equity plan, they also shallprovide the disclosures at such time.10a (d) <T3>Content of disclosures. </T3>The creditor shall provide the followingdisclosures, as applicable: (1) <T3>Retention of information. </T3>A statement that the consumer shouldmake or otherwise retain a copy of the disclosures. (2) <T3>Conditions for disclosed terms. </T3>(i) A statement of the time bywhich the consumer must submit an   application to obtain specific termsdisclosed and an identification of any disclosed term that is subject tochange prior to opening the plan. (ii) A statement that, if a disclosed term changes (other than a changedue to fluctuations in the index in a variable-rate plan) prior to openingthe plan and the consumer therefore elects not to open the plan, the consumermay receive a refund of all fees paid in connection with the application.(3) <T3>Security interest and risk to home. </T3>A statement that the creditorwill acquire a security interest in the consumer's dwelling and that lossof the dwelling may occur in the event of default. (4) <T3>Possible actions by creditor. </T3>(i) A statement that, under certainconditions, the creditor may terminate the plan and require payment ofthe outstanding balance in full in a single payment and impose fees upontermination; prohibit additional extensions of credit or reduce the creditlimit; and, as specified in the initial agreement, implement certain changesin the plan. (ii) A statement that the consumer may receive, upon request, informationabout the conditions under which such actions may occur.(iii) In lieu of the disclosure required under paragraph (d)(4)(ii) ofthis section, a statement of such conditions. (5) <T3>Payment terms. </T3>The payment terms of the plan, including: (i) The length of the draw period and any repayment period. (ii) An explanation of how the minimum periodic payment will be determinedand the timing of the payments. If paying only the minimum periodic paymentsmay not repay any of the principal or may repay less than the outstandingbalance, a statement of this fact, as well as a statement that a balloonpayment may result.10b<NOTE/>  <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>10bA balloon payment results if paying the minimum periodicpayments does not fully amortize the outstanding balance by a specifieddate or time, and the consumer must repay the entire outstanding balanceat such time.  (iii) An example, based on a $10,000 outstanding balance and a recent annualpercentage rate,10c<NOTE/> showing the minimum periodic payment, any balloon    payment,and the time it would take to repay the $10,000 outstanding balance ifthe consumer made only those payments and obtained no additional extensionsof credit.  <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>10cFor fixed-rate plans, a recent annual percentage rate isa rate that has been in effect under the plan within the twelve monthspreceding the date the disclosures are provided to the consumer. For variable-rateplans, a recent annual percentage rate is the most recent rate providedin the historical example described in paragraph (d)(12)(xi) of this sectionor a rate that has been in effect under the plan since the date of themost recent rate in the table.  If different payment terms may apply to the draw and any repayment period,or if different payment terms may apply within either period, the disclosuresshall reflect the different payment terms. (6) <T3>Annual percentage rate. </T3>For fixed-rate plans, a recent annualpercentage rate10c imposed under the plan and a statement that the ratedoes not include costs other than interest. (7) <T3>Fees imposed by creditor. </T3>An itemization of any fees imposed bythe creditor to open, use, or maintain the plan, stated as a dollar amountor percentage, and when such fees are payable. (8) <T3>Fees imposed by third parties to open a plan. </T3>A good faith estimate,stated as a single dollar amount or range, of any fees that may be imposedby persons other than the creditor to open the plan, as well as a statementthat the consumer may receive, upon request, a good faith itemization ofsuch fees. In lieu of the statement, the itemization of such fees may beprovided. (9) <T3>Negative amortization. </T3>A statement that negative amortizationmay occur and that negative amortization increases the principal balanceand reduces the consumer's equity in the dwelling. (10) <T3>Transaction requirements. </T3>Any limitations on the number of extensionsof credit and the amount of credit that may be obtained during any timeperiod, as well as any minimum outstanding balance and minimum draw requirements,stated as dollar amounts or percentages. (11) <T3>Tax implications. </T3>A statement that the consumer should consulta tax advisor regarding the deductibility of interest and charges underthe plan. (12) <T3>Disclosures for variable-rate plans. </T3>For a plan in which the annualpercentage rate is variable, the following disclosures, as applicable:(i) The fact that the annual percentage rate, payment, or term may changedue to the variable-rate feature. (ii) A statement that the annual percentage rate does not include costsother than interest. (iii) The index used in making rate adjustments and a source of informationabout the index. (iv) An explanation of how the annual percentage rate will be determined,including an explanation of how the index is adjusted, such as by the additionof a margin. (v) A statement that the consumer should ask about the current index value,margin, discount or premium, and annual percentage rate. (vi) A statement that the initial annual percentage rate is not based onthe index and margin used to make later rate adjustments, and the periodof time such initial rate will be in effect. (vii) The frequency of changes in the annual percentage rate. (viii) Any rules relating to changes in the index value and the annualpercentage rate and resulting changes in the payment amount, including,for example, an explanation of payment limitations and rate carryover.(ix) A statement of any annual or more frequent periodic limitations onchanges in the annual percentage rate (or a statement that no annual limitationexists), as well as a statement of the maximum annual percentage rate thatmay be imposed under each payment option. (x) The minimum periodic payment required when the maximum annual percentagerate for each payment option is in effect for a $10,000 outstanding balance,and a statement of the earliest date or time the maximum rate may be imposed.(xi) An historical example, based on a $10,000 extension of credit, illustratinghow annual percentage rates and payments would have been affected by indexvalue changes implemented according to the terms of the plan. The historicalexample shall be based on the most recent 15 years of index values (selectedfor the same time period each year) and shall reflect all significant planterms, such as negative amortization, rate carryover, rate discounts, andrate and payment limitations, that would have been affected by the indexmovement during the period. (xii) A statement that rate information will be provided on or with eachperiodic statement. (e) <T3>Brochure. </T3>The home equity brochure published by the Board or asuitable substitute shall be provided. (f) <T3>Limitations on home equity plans. </T3>No creditor may, by contractor otherwise:  (1) Change the annual percentage rate unless: (i) Such change is based on an index that is not under the creditor's control;and (ii) Such index is available to the general public. (2) Terminate a plan and demand repayment of the entire outstanding balancein advance of the original term unless: (i) There is fraud or material misrepresentation by the consumer in connectionwith the plan; (ii) The consumer fails to meet the repayment terms of the agreement forany outstanding balance; or (iii) Any action or inaction by the consumer adversely affects the creditor'ssecurity for the plan, or any right of the creditor in such security. (3) Change any term, except that a creditor may: (i) Provide in the initial agreement that specified changes will occurif a specific event takes place (for example, that the annual percentagerate will increase a specified amount if the consumer leaves the creditor'semployment).(ii) Change the index and margin used under the plan if the original indexis no longer available, the new index has an historical movement substantiallysimilar to that of the original index, and the new index and margin wouldhave resulted in an annual percentage rate substantially similar to therate in effect at the time the original index became unavailable. (iii) Make a specified change if the consumer specifically agrees to itin writing at that time. (iv) Make a change that will unequivocally benefit the consumer throughoutthe remainder of the plan. (v) Make an insignificant change to terms. (vi) Prohibit additional extensions of credit or reduce the credit limitapplicable to an agreement during any period in which: (A) The value of the dwelling that secures the plan declines significantlybelow the dwelling's appraised value for purposes of the plan; (B) The creditor reasonably believes that the consumer will be unable tofulfill the repayment obligations under the plan because of a materialchange in the consumer's financial circumstances; (C) The consumer is in default of any material obligation under the agreement;(D) The creditor is precluded by government action from imposing the annualpercentage rate provided for in the agreement; (E) The priority of the creditor's security interest is adversely affectedby government action to the extent that the value of the security interestis less than 120 percent of the credit line; (F) The creditor is notified by its regulatory agency that continued advancesconstitute an unsafe and unsound practice; or (G) The maximum annual percentage rate is reached. (g) <T3>Refund of fees. </T3>A creditor shall refund all fees paid by the consumerto anyone in connection with an application if any term required to bedisclosed under paragraph (d) of this section changes (other than a changedue to fluctuations in the index in a variable-rate plan) before the planis opened and, as a result, the consumer elects not to open the plan. (h) <T3>Imposition of nonrefundable fees. </T3>Neither a creditor nor any otherperson may impose a nonrefundable fee in connection with an applicationuntil three business days after the consumer receives the disclosures andbrochure required under this section.10d<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>10d If the disclosures and brochure are mailed to the consumer,the consumer is considered to have received them three business days afterthey are mailed. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>6. Section 226.6 is amended by adding paragraph (e) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 226.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Initial disclosure statement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(e) <T3>Home equity plan information. </T3>The following disclosures describedin andSection; 226.5b(d), as applicable: (1) A statement of the conditions under which the creditor may take certainaction, as described in andSection; 226.5b(d)(4)(i), such as terminatingthe plan or changing the terms. (2) The payment information described in andSection; 226.5b(d)(5) (i) and(ii) for both the draw period and any repayment period.   (3) A statement that negative amortization may occur as described in andSection;226.5b(d)(9). (4) A statement of any transaction requirements as described in andSection;226.5b(d)(10). (5) A statement regarding the tax implications as described in andSection;226.5b(d)(11). (6) A statement that the annual percentage rate imposed under the plandoes not include costs other than interest as described in andSection;andSection;226.5b(d)(6) and 226.5b(d)(12)(ii). (7) The variable-rate disclosures described in andSection; 226.5b(d)(12)(viii), (x), (xi), and (xii), as well as the disclosure described in andSection;226.5b(d)(5)(iii), unless the disclosures provided with the applicationwere in a form the consumer could keep and included a representative paymentexample for the category of payment option chosen by the consumer. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>7. Section 226.9 is amended by adding paragraph (c)(3) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 226.9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Subsequent disclosure requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) <T3>Change in terms. </T3><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>(3) Notice for home equity plans.</T3> If a creditor prohibits additionalextensions of credit or reduces the credit limit applicable to a home equityplan pursuant to andSection; 226.5b(f)(3)(vi), the creditor shall mail ordeliver written notice of the action to each consumer who will be affected.The notice must be provided not later than three business days after theaction is taken and shall contain specific reasons for the action. If thecreditor requires the consumer to request reinstatement of credit privileges,the notice also shall state that fact. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>8. Section 226.14 is amended by revising paragraph (b) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 226.14 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Determination of annual percentage rate. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) <T3>Annual percentage rate for sections 226.5a and 226.5b disclosures,for initial disclosures and for advertising purposes.</T3> Where one ormore periodic rates may be used to compute the finance charge, the annualpercentage rate(s) to be disclosed for purposes of andSection;andSection; 226.5a,226.5b, 226.6, and 226.16 shall be computed by multiplying each periodicrate by the number of periods in a year. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>9. Section 226.15 is amended by revising footnote 36 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 226.15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Right of rescission. </ITAG>(a) * * * (3) * * * \36\<NOTE/>  <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\36\ The term ``material disclosures'' means the informationthat must be provided to satisfy the requirements in section 226.6 withregard to the method of determining the finance charge and the balanceupon which a finance charge will be imposed, the annual percentage rate,the amount or method of determining the amount of any membership or participationfee that may be imposed as part of the plan, and the payment informationdescribed in andSection;226.5b(d)(5)(i) and (ii) that is required under andSection;226.6(e)(2). 10. Section 226.16 is amended by adding paragraph (d) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 226.16 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Advertising. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(d) <T3>Additional requirements for home equity plans_</T3>(1) Advertisementof terms that require additional disclosures. If any of the terms requiredto be disclosed under andSection; 226.6(a) or (b) or the payment terms ofthe plan are set forth, affirmatively or negatively, in an advertisementfor a home equity plan subject to the requirements of andSection; 226.5b,the advertisement also shall clearly and conspicuously set forth the following:(i) Any loan fee that is a percentage of the credit limit under the planand an estimate of any other fees imposed for opening the plan, statedas a   single dollar amount or a reasonable range. (ii) Any periodic rate used to compute the finance charge, expressed asan annual percentage rate as determined under section andSection; 226.14(b).(iii) The maximum annual percentage rate that may be imposed in a variable-rateplan. (2) <T3>Discounted and premium rates.</T3> If an advertisement states an initialannual percentage rate that is not based on the index and margin used tomake later rate adjustments in a variable-rate plan, the advertisementalso shall state the period of time such rate will be in effect, and, withequal prominence to the initial rate, a reasonably current annual percentagerate that would have been in effect using the index and margin. (3) <T3>Balloon payment.</T3> If an advertisement contains a statement aboutany minimum periodic payment, the advertisement also shall state, if applicable,that a balloon payment may result.10b (4) <T3>Tax implications.</T3> An advertisement that states that any interestexpense incurred under the home equity plan is or may be tax deductiblemay not be misleading in this regard. (5) <T3>Misleading terms.</T3> An advertisement may not refer to a home equityplan as ``free money'' or contain a similarly misleading term. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>11. Appendix G is amended by adding model forms and clauses G-14A, G-14B,G-14C, and G-15 to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="84">APPENDIX G_Open-End Model Forms and Clauses </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">G-14A Home Equity Sample </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">G-14B Home Equity Sample </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">G-14C Home Equity Sample (Repayment phase disclosed later) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">G-15 Home Equity Model Clauses </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">By order of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System,June 1, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">William W. Wiles, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary of the Board. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">Billing Code 6210-01-M010 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-13507 Filed 6-8-89; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6210-01-C </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>